 




<DOCTITLE>Biweekly Notice</DOCTITLE>



Applications and Amendments to Facility Operating Licenses
Involving No Significant Hazards Considerations

I. Background


Pursuant to Public Law 97-415, the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission (the Commission or NRC staff) is publishing
this regular biweekly notice. Public Law 97-415 revised section 189 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the
Act), to require the Commission to publish notice of any amendments issued, or proposed to be issued, under a new provision
of section 189 of the Act. This provision grants the Commission the authority to issue and make immediately effective
any amendment to an operating license upon a determination by the Commission that such amendment involves no significant
hazards consideration, notwithstanding the pendency before the Commission of a request for a hearing from any person.

This biweekly notice includes all notices of amendments issued, or proposed to be issued from November 28, 1994, through
December 9, 1994. The last biweekly notice was published on December 7, 1994.



Notice Of Consideration Of Issuance Of Amendments To Facility Operating Licenses, Proposed No Significant Hazards
Consideration Determination, And Opportunity For A Hearing



The Commission has made a proposed determination that the following amendment requests involve no significant hazards
consideration. Under the Commission's regulations in 10 CFR 50.92, this means that operation of the facility in accordance
with the proposed amendment would not (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an
accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident
previously evaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The basis for this proposed determination
for each amendment request is shown below. 
The Commission is seeking public comments on this proposed determination. Any comments received within 30 days after
the date of publication of this notice will be considered in making any final determination. 
Normally, the Commission will not issue the amendment until the expiration of the 30-day notice period. However,
should circumstances change during the notice period such that failure to act in a timely way would result, for example,
in derating or shutdown of the facility, the Commission may issue the license amendment before the expiration of the
30-day notice period, provided that its final determination is that the amendment involves no significant hazards
consideration. The final determination will consider all public and State comments received before action is taken.
Should the Commission take this action, it will publish in the 

Federal Register 

a notice of issuance and provide for opportunity for a hearing after issuance. The Commission expects that the need
to take this action will occur very infrequently. 
Written comments may be submitted by mail to the Rules Review and Directives Branch, Division of Freedom of Information
and Publications Services, Office of Administration, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555,
and should cite the publication date and page number of this 

Federal Register 

notice. Written comments may also be delivered to Room 6D22, Two White Flint North, 11545 Rockville Pike, Rockville,
Maryland from 7:30 a.m. to 4:15 p.m. Federal workdays. Copies of written comments received may be examined at the NRC
Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC. The filing of requests for a hearing
and petitions for leave to intervene is discussed below.
By January 13, 1995, the licensee may file a request for a hearing with respect to issuance of the amendment to the subject
facility operating license and any person whose interest may be affected by this proceeding and who wishes to participate
as a party in the proceeding must file a written request for a hearing and a petition for leave to intervene. Requests
for a hearing and a petition for leave to intervene shall be filed in accordance with the Commission's ``Rules of Practice
for Domestic Licensing Proceedings'' in 10 CFR Part 2. Interested persons should consult a current copy of 10 CFR 2.714
which is available at the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington,
DC and at the local public document room for the particular facility involved. If a request for a hearing or petition
for leave to intervene is filed by the above date, the Commission or an Atomic Safety and Licensing Board, designated
by the Commission or by the Chairman of the Atomic Safety and Licensing Board Panel, will rule on the request and/or
petition; and the Secretary or the designated Atomic Safety and Licensing Board will issue a notice of a hearing or
an appropriate order. 
As required by 10 CFR 2.714, a petition for leave to intervene shall set forth with particularity the interest of the
petitioner in the proceeding, and how that interest may be affected by the results of the proceeding. The petition
should specifically explain the reasons why intervention should be permitted with particular reference to the following
factors: (1) the nature of the petitioner's right under the Act to be made a party to the proceeding; (2) the nature and
extent of the petitioner's property, financial, or other interest in the proceeding; and (3) the possible effect
of any order which may be entered in the proceeding on the petitioner's interest. The petition should also identify
the specific aspect(s) of the subject matter of the proceeding as to which petitioner wishes to intervene. Any person
who has filed a petition for leave to intervene or who has been admitted as a party may amend the petition without requesting
leave of the Board up to 15 days prior to the first prehearing conference scheduled in the proceeding, but such an amended
petition must satisfy the specificity requirements described above.
Not later than 15 days prior to the first prehearing conference scheduled in the proceeding, a petitioner shall file
a supplement to the petition to intervene which must include a list of the contentions which are sought to be litigated
in the matter. Each contention must consist of a specific statement of the issue of law or fact to be raised or controverted.
In addition, the petitioner shall provide a brief explanation of the bases of the contention and a concise statement
of the alleged facts or expert opinion which support the contention and on which the petitioner intends to rely in proving
the contention at the hearing. The petitioner must also provide references to those specific sources and documents
of which the petitioner is aware and on which the petitioner intends to rely to establish those facts or expert opinion.
Petitioner must provide sufficient information to show that a genuine dispute exists with the applicant on a material
issue of law or fact. Contentions shall be limited to matters within the scope of the amendment under consideration.
The contention must be one which, if proven, would entitle the petitioner to relief. A petitioner who fails to file
such a supplement which satisfies these requirements with respect to at least one contention will not be permitted
to participate as a party. 
Those permitted to intervene become parties to the proceeding, subject to any limitations in the order granting leave
to intervene, and have the opportunity to participate fully in the conduct of the hearing, including the opportunity
to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses. 
If a hearing is requested, the Commission will make a final determination on the issue of no significant hazards consideration.
The final determination will serve to decide when the hearing is held. 
If the final determination is that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration, the Commission
may issue the amendment and make it immediately effective, notwithstanding the request for a hearing. Any hearing
held would take place after issuance of the amendment. 
If the final determination is that the amendment request involves a significant hazards consideration, any hearing
held would take place before the issuance of any amendment. 
A request for a hearing or a petition for leave to intervene must be filed with the Secretary of the Commission, U.S.
Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Docketing and Services Branch, or may be delivered
to the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington DC, by the above date.
Where petitions are filed during the last 10 days of the notice period, it is requested that the petitioner promptly
so inform the Commission by a toll-free telephone call to Western Union at 1-(800) 248-5100 (in Missouri 1-(800) 342-6700).
The Western Union operator should be given Datagram Identification Number N1023 and the following message addressed
to 

(Project Director)

: petitioner's name and telephone number, date petition was mailed, plant name, and publication date and page number
of this 

Federal Register 

notice. A copy of the petition should also be sent to the Office of the General Counsel, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,
Washington, DC 20555, and to the attorney for the licensee. 
Nontimely filings of petitions for leave to intervene, amended petitions, supplemental petitions and/or requests
for a hearing will not be entertained absent a determination by the Commission, the presiding officer or the Atomic
Safety and Licensing Board that the petition and/or request should be granted based upon a balancing of factors specified
in 10 CFR 2.714(a)(1)(i)-(v) and 2.714(d). 
For further details with respect to this action, see the application for amendment which is available for public inspection
at the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC, and at the local
public document room for the particular facility involved. 



Arizona Public Service Company, et al., Docket Nos. STN 50-528, STN 50-529, and STN 50-530, Palo Verde Nuclear Generating
Station, Unit Nos. 1, 2, and 3, Maricopa County, Arizona




Date of amendment requests: 

November 2, 1994


Description of amendment requests: 

The proposed amendment would delete the Condenser Vacuum Exhaust release point reference on Figure 5.1-3 and combine
it with the Plant Vent Exhaust release point on the revised Figure 5.1-3. In addition to the figure change, Bases Section
3/4.3.3.6 is amended to note the deletion of radiation monitor RU-142 and the relocation of RU-144 and RU-146 from
Table 3.3-13 (previously deleted) to the Offsite Dose Calculation Manual (ODCM).


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensees have provided their analysis about the issue of no significant hazards
consideration, which is presented below:
 




Standard 1_

Does the proposed change involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously
evaluated?

Combining the condenser vacuum and the plant vent exhausts has no affect 

[sic] 

on the operation of the radiation monitoring system or its intended functions. Routing of the condenser vacuum exhaust
to the plant vent exhaust is in the same area as the old system and does not affect accident initiation or consequences.
The change has no affect 

[sic] 

on the operation of the plant. The radiation monitors affected by this change do not provide engineered safety features
or protection system actuation signals. Therefore, the change does not involve a significant increase in the probability
or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.



Standard 2 -- 

Does the proposed change create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously
evaluated?

The overall system is designed to assist the operators in evaluating and controlling the radiological consequences
of normal plant operations, anticipated operational occurrences, and postulated accidents. The change does not
affect the way the system is operated. Therefore, the change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind
of accident from any accident previously evaluated.



Standard 3 -- Does the proposed change involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety?

Combining of the condenser vacuum and plant vent exhaust into a single release path does not involve a significant
reduction in a margin of safety. The change involves the removal of one high range monitor in the condenser vent, however,
its function is provided by the high range monitor in the plant vent. The ranges of the monitors are the same. The existing
plant effluent radiation monitors will serve to monitor both the plant and condenser air removal system effluent.
The normal range monitors have the ability to adequately detect radiation over five decades and these monitors will
stay in place and they have the ability to perform the anticipated radiation release detection. Therefore, the proposed
change does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on that review, it appears that the three standards of
50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment requests involve no significant
hazards consideration.
Local Public Document Room location: 

Phoenix Public Library, 12 East McDowell Road, Phoenix, Arizona 85004


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: I11Attorney for licensees: 

Nancy C. Loftin, Esq., Corporate Secretary and Counsel, Arizona Public Service Company, P.O. Box 53999, Mail Station
9068, Phoenix, Arizona 85072-3999 


NRC Project Director: 

Theodore R. Quay
 


Carolina Power  Light Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-325 and 50-324, Brunswick Steam Electric Plant, Units
1 and 2, Brunswick County,
North Carolina




Date of amendments request: 

November 16, 1994 
Description of amendments request: The proposed Technical Specification (TS) change would (1) revise TS 4.6.1.2
by removing the schedular requirements for Type A overall integrated leakage rate tests to be performed at 40 plus
or minus 10 month intervals and replacing the acceptance criteria for these Type A integrated leakage rate tests with
a reference to the containment integrated leakage testing requirements of Appendix J to 10 CFR Part 50, (2) delete
TS 4.6.1.2.a through TS 4.6.1.2.c because they are no longer needed, (3) revise TS 4.6.1.2.h to remove the prohibition
against applying TS 4.0.2 to the 40 plus or minus 10 month integrated leakage rate test frequency, (4) delete Unit 1
one-time footnote * located on TS page 3/4 6-3A and on Table 4.6.1.2-1 listed on TS page 3/4 6-3B since the exception
provision has expired, (5) delete Unit 1 one-time footnote ** located on TS page 3/4 6-3A since the exception has expired,

(6) delete Unit 2 footnote * located on TS page 3/4 6-3 because the exception constitutes an approved exemption.


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:



. The proposed amendments do not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident
previously evaluated. The proposed amendments remove the detailed technical and schedular information pertaining
to primary containment integrated leakage rate testing from the Technical Specifications and references the corresponding
requirements that are located in the Appendix J to 10 CFR Part 50. As such, the proposed amendments are an administrative
change since the actual requirements for the performance of primary containment integrated leakage rate testing
are not being changed. No safety-related equipment, safety function, or plant operations will be altered as a result
of the proposed amendments. The change does not affect the design, materials, or construction standards of the primary
containment nor the test methods, test acceptance criteria, or testing frequencies applicable to primary containment
integrated leakage rate testing. Based on the above, the proposed license amendments do not create a significant
increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.

2. The proposed amendments would not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident
previously evaluated. As stated above, no safety-related equipment, safety function, or plant operations will
be altered as a result of the proposed change. The proposed amendments do not change the primary containment design
or the test methods, test acceptance criteria, or testing frequencies for primary containment integrated leakage
rate testing. As such, the proposed license amendments cannot create the possibility of a new or different kind of
accident from any accident previously evaluated.

3. The proposed amendments do not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. The proposed amendments
do not involve any changes to the test methods, acceptance criteria, or testing frequency for primary containment
integrated leakage rate testing. Thus, the proposed amendments will not affect the ability of the primary containment
to perform its intended safety function and no margins of safety, as defined by the plant's accident analyses, are
impacted. Primary containment integrated leakage rate testing will continue to be performed in accordance with
the regulatory requirements of Appendix J to 10 CFR Part 50. Based on the above reasoning, the proposed license amendments
do not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are 
satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards
consideration.


Local Public Document Room location: 

University of North Carolina at Wilmington, William Madison Randall Library, 601 S. College Road, Wilmington, North
Carolina 28403-3297.


Attorney for licensee: 

R. E. Jones, General Counsel, Carolina Power  Light Company, Post Office Box 1551, Raleigh, North Carolina 27602


NRC Project Director: 

William H. Bateman



Duke Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-369 and 50-370, McGuire Nuclear Station, Units 1 and 2, Mecklenburg County, North
Carolina




Date of amendment request: 

September 28, 1994


Description of amendment request: 

Amendments will update the ``Loss of Power'' functional unit of the Engineered Safety Features Actuation System
(ESFAS) Instrumentation tables within the Technical Specifications for McGuire Nuclear Station.


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:



As required by 10 CFR 50.91, this analysis is provided concerning whether the requested amendments involve significant
hazards considerations, as defined by 10 CFR 50.92. Standards for determination that an amendment request involves
no significant hazards considerations are if operation of the facility in accordance with the requested amendment
would not: 1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated;
or 2) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated; or 3) Involve
a significant reduction in a margin of safety.

The requested amendments update the existing one-level undervoltage protection to be exclusively for loss of voltage,
and add a second level of undervoltage protection to be exclusively for degraded voltage.

In 48 FR 14870, the Commission has set forth examples of amendments that are considered not likely to involve significant
hazards considerations. Example vi describes a change which either may result in some increase to the probability
or consequences of a previously-analyzed accident or may reduce in some way a safety margin, but where the results
of the change are clearly within all acceptable criteria with respect to the system or component specified in the Standard
Review Plan. The requested amendments are similar to example vi in that they result in some increase to the probability
of a previously-analyzed accident, the Loss of Offsite Power accident, but where the changes are clearly based on
the recommendations of Branch Technical Position PSB-1.



Criterion 1

The requested amendments will not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident
previously evaluated. The requested amendments will involve some increase in the probability of an accident previously
evaluated. Automatic separation from offsite power (a LOOP accident) will be more probable because the voltage setpoints
for the new relaying will be higher than the settings for the existing relaying. The closer relay settings are to 100%
bus voltage, the more frequently actual bus voltage can be expected to occur at or below the setpoint. The occurrence
of a LOOP presents a challenge to safety systems. More probable (e.g., more frequent) LOOPs increase the frequency
of safety system challenges, which increases the probability of malfunction of equipment important to safety. However,
offsetting this probability increase is a probability decrease due to the protection of safety equipment from degraded
voltage conditions, given by the added protective relaying. The EPC system is required to provide power for equipment
used for accident mitigation and safe shutdown. The ability of the EPC system to perform its required safety functions
will not be degraded by the implementation of this TS change. No common failure modes are created between redundant
EPC system power trains. Therefore, the consequences of an accident or malfunction of equipment important to safety
evaluated in the SAR are not increased.

Criterion 2

The requested amendments will not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously
evaluated. No new failure modes are created by the implementation of this TS change. No accidents previously considered
incredible are made credible. The added protective relaying is expected to be as reliable as the existing relaying.
The added equipment is QA Condition 1, and qualifications of equipment enclosures have been maintained. Thus, the
possibility of an accident or malfunction of equipment of a different type than evaluated in the SAR will not be created.

Criterion 3

The requested amendments will not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The setpoints for the existing
Loss of Power protective relays are lowered by this TS change. The new setpoints have been evaluated and will not prevent
the protective relaying from performing its required safety function. The fission product barriers (RCS pressure
boundary, containment, fuel pellets, and cladding) are not degraded. No assumptions made in any accident analysis
are affected by the implementation of this TS change, except as previously discussed for probability of a Loss of Offsite
Power. Therefore, the margin of safety as defined in the basis for any Technical Specification is not decreased.

Based on the preceding analyses, Duke Power concludes that the requested amendments do not involve a significant
hazards consideration.
 


The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves
no significant hazards consideration. 
Local Public Document Room location: 

Atkins Library, University of North Carolina, Charlotte (UNCC Station), North Carolina 28223


Attorney for licensee: 

Mr. Albert Carr, Duke Power Company, 422 South Church Street, Charlotte, North Carolina 28242


NRC Project Director: 

Herbert N. Berkow



Duquesne Light Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-334 and 50-412,
Beaver Valley Power Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Shippingport, Pennsylvania




Date of amendment request: 

August 31, 1994


Description of amendment request: 

The proposed amendment would revise Technical Specifications (TSs), Section 6, Administrative Controls, and includes
line-item improvements suggested by Generic Letter 93-07. 
The proposed changes include the following:



1. Elimination of the references to specific frequencies for each of the Technical Specification required audits.

2. Elimination of the references to reviews and audits of the Emergency Plan and Security Plan.

3. Separation of the Inservice Inspection (ISI) and Inservice Testing (IST) Programs surveillance requirements
and removal of the requirement that relief requests be granted before they are implemented for both IST and ISI.

4. Editorial changes which were necessitated by a reorganization.

5. Elimination of the reference to Appendix A of 10 CFR Part 55.

6. Elimination of the requirement to perform an independent fire protection and loss prevention program inspection
annually.

7. Inclusion of the Offsite Dose Calculation Manual and Process Control Program and associated implementing procedures
into the list of required audits.

8. Updates of the Beaver Valley Power Station (BVPS) Unit 2 License Conditions to reflect completion of activities.





Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:



1. Does the change involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated?

The likelihood that an accident will occur is neither increased or decreased by this proposed Technical Specification
change which only affects review and audit frequencies, removes redundancies in the audit program, corrects editorial
information, and updates the Unit 2 license conditions. This Technical Specification change will not impact the
function or method of operation of plant equipment. Thus, there is not a significant increase in the probability of
a previously analyzed accident due to this change. No systems, equipment, or components are affected by the proposed
change. Thus, the consequences of a malfunction of equipment important to safety previously evaluated in the Updated
Final Safety Analysis Report are not increased by this change.

The proposed change affects audit frequencies, types of audits listed in the technical specifications, references
for some technical specification sections, the time frame for Inservice Testing (IST) and Inservice Inspection
(ISI) relief request submittals, and editorial changes necessitated by an internal reorganization. As such, the
proposed change has no impact on accident initiators or plant equipment, and therefore, does not affect the probabilities
or consequences of an accident.

Therefore, the proposed change will not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident
previously evaluated.

2. Does the change create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated?

The proposed technical specification revisions do not involve changes to the physical plant or operations. Since
program audits, organizational titles, and technical specification references do not contribute to accident initiation,
a change related to the areas listed in the description section [***] cannot produce a new accident scenario or produce
a new type of equipment malfunction. Therefore, this change does not alter any existing accident scenarios. The proposed
change does not affect equipment or its operation.

Therefore, the proposed change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident
previously evaluated.

3. Does the change involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety?

The proposed change concerns the conduct of audits, technical specification references, ISI and IST relief request
submittals, completed License conditions, and organizational title changes and does not directly affect plant
equipment or operation. Safety limits and limiting safety system settings are not affected by this proposed change.

Therefore, use of the proposed Technical Specification would not involve a significant reduction in the margin of
safety.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment involves no significant
hazards consideration.


Local Public Document Room location: 

B. F. Jones Memorial Library, 663 Franklin Avenue, Alquippa, Pennsylvania 15001.


Attorney for licensee: 

Gerald Charnoff, Esquire, Jay E. Silberg, Esquire, Shaw, Pittman, Potts  Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington,
DC 20037. 


NRC Project Director: 

Walter R. Butler



Entergy Operations Inc., Docket No. 50-382, Waterford Steam Electric
Station, Unit 3, St. Charles Parish, Louisiana




Date of amendment request: 

August 11, 1994, as supplemented December 2, 1994.


Description of amendment request: 

The requested change would remove cycle-specific variables from the Waterford 3 Technical Specifications (TSs)
and control them under a new document called the Core Operating Limits Report (COLR). All cycle-specific limits that
are to be included in the COLR must be calculated using NRC approved methodologies. The proposed change is consistent
with the TS line-item improvement guidelines provided by the NRC in Generic Letter (GL) 88-16, ``Removal of Cycle-Specific
Parameter Limits From Technical Specifications,'' dated October 3, 1988. 


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:
 


1. Removing cycle-specific variables from the TS and placing them into a COLR, is consistent with the NRC guidance
provided in GL 88-16. These changes are administrative in nature and have no impact on plant operation or accident
analyses. The TS will continue to require operation within the core operational limits for each cycle reload calculated
by the approved reload methodologies. If these limits are violated, Technical Specifications will continue to ensure
that the appropriate actions are taken.

The cycle-specific evaluation demonstrates that changes in the fuel cycle design and the corresponding COLR do not
involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.

Listing the NRC approved methodologies in the COLR as opposed to the TS Administrative Controls section is purely
an administrative change in contrast to NUREG 1432. The proposed change requires the use of NRC approved methodologies.
Listing the approved methodologies in the TS provides the potential for an increased licensee and NRC administrative
burden without a commensurate increase in safety or control.

Therefore, the proposed changes do not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident
previously evaluated.

2. The proposed changes, to relocate the cycle-specific variables from TS to the COLR, are administrative in nature.
No change in the design, configuration, or method of operation of the plant is made by this amendment. The cycle-specific
variables will continue to be calculated using NRC approved methods. TS will continue to require operation within
the required core operating limits and appropriate actions will be taken if the limits are exceeded.

Listing the NRC approved methodologies in the COLR as opposed to the TS Administrative Controls section is purely
an administrative change in contrast to NUREG 1432. The proposed change requires the use of NRC approved methodologies.
Listing the approved methodologies in the TS provides the potential for an increased licensee and NRC administrative
burden without a commensurate increase in safety or control.

Therefore, the proposed changes do not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident
previously evaluated.

3. The margin of safety presently provided is not affected by removing cycle-specific core operating limits from
TS. The core limits contained in the COLR are obtained through analyses using NRC approved methodologies. The TS still:
(1) require that the core be operated within these limits and (2) specify appropriate actions to be taken if the limits
are violated. The cycle-
specific COLR limits for future reload will also be developed based on NRC-approved methodologies. In addition,
each reload will involve a 10CFR 50.59 safety review to assure that operation of the unit within the cycle-specific
limits will not involve a reduction in a margin of safety.

Therefore, the proposed changes do not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.



Safety and Significant Hazard Determination
 
Based on the above safety analysis, it is concluded that: (1) the proposed change does not constitute a significant
hazards consideration as defined by 10CFR50.92; and (2) there is a reasonable assurance that the health and safety
of the public will not be endangered by the proposed change; and (3) this action will not result in a condition which
significantly alters the impact of the station on the environment as described in the NRC Final Environmental Statement.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves
no significant hazards consideration.
Local Public Document Room location: 

University of New Orleans Library, Louisiana Collection, Lakefront, New Orleans, Louisiana 70122


Attorney for licensee: 

N.S. Reynolds, Esq., Winston  Strawn 1400 L Street N.W., Washington, D.C. 20005-3502


NRC Project Director: 

William D. Beckner



Georgia Power Company, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, Municipal Electric Authority of Georgia, City of Dalton,
Georgia, Docket Nos. 50-321 and 50-366, Edwin I. Hatch Nuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Appling County, Georgia




Date of amendment request: 

October 13, 1994


Description of amendment request: 

The proposed amendments would revise the Hatch Technical Specifications (TS) as follows:
1. Lower the anticipated transient without scram-recirculation pump trip (ATWS-RPT) setpoint by approximately
2 feet 2 inches to minimize the potential for recirculation pump trips following reactor scrams. 

2. Allow restarting the recirculation pump following an RPT when the temperature differential between the coolant
at the reactor bottom head and the reactor steam dome cannot be obtained, provided certain conditions are met. 

The licensee believes the above changes will aid in preventing thermal stratification and unnecessary thermal cycles
resulting from the rapid cooldown of the bottom head region and the reduction in reactor pressure to atmospheric conditions.



Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration
which is presented below:





Proposed Change 1

Proposed Change 1 does not involve a significant hazards consideration, because it does not:

1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.

Lowering the ATWS-RPT trip will not increase the probability of occurrence of any design basis accident or transient,
since this change does not physically affect any component of the reactor coolant pressure boundary (RCPB). Therefore,
the probability of a LOCA event is not increased. Lowering the ATWS-RPT water level setpoint does not increase the
probability of an ATWS event, since no component of the CRD system or the reactor protection system is being physically
altered by this change. Also, the operation of these two systems is not affected. 

Reducing the setpoint may require installation of new slave trip units; however, this addition does not increase
the probability of occurrence of accidents or transients. The new trip units will be functionally identical to other
slave trip units already in use at Plant Hatch and are within the design capabilities of ATTS. In conclusion, no safety-related
plant system or component is being affected in a manner that would render it more susceptible to failure. 

Lowering the setpoint does not result in an increase of the consequences of a previously evaluated accident. GE reviewed
the proposed reduction and determined the results of the ATWS event with the lowered setpoint remain acceptable.
An approved analytical method (REDY) was used to evaluate a bounding ATWS event -- LOFW [loss of feedwater]. The results
indicate that reactor power with the new ATWS-RPT setpoint remains stable, with no unacceptable power spikes. Hot
and cold reactor shutdowns can still be ultimately attained. 

The consequences of non-ATWS events are not increased. For LOCA events, reducing the recirculation pump low water
level trip setpoint allows the recirculation pumps to run longer. The forced circulation provided by the recirculation
pumps keeps the fuel cooler for a longer period of time. The ECCS-LOCA analysis assumes the pump trip and coastdown
early in the event. Therefore, lowering the ATWS-RPT makes the ECCS-LOCA analysis more conservative and, as a result,
it does not need to change. 

Based on the above discussion, Proposed Change 1 does not constitute an increase in the probability or consequences
of a previously analyzed accident. 
 
2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously evaluated. 

Lowering the ATWS-RPT trip will not alter the design or operation of any safety-related system. The change may require
adding new slave trip units to ATTS; however, the new trip units will be functionally identical to the equipment already
in use at Plant Hatch. Furthermore, the addition of this slave trip unit is within the design capabilities of ATTS.


Since no new operation modes, accident scenarios, or failure modes are introduced, Proposed Change 1 does not create
the possibility of a new type of accident. 

3. Involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. 

As stated previously, reducing the ATWS-RPT low water level setpoint will not cause unacceptable results for ATWS
events. Specifically, the LOFW event is bounding for all the ATWS events. An evaluation using approved analytical
methods indicates that reducing the ATWS-RPT setpoint will not result in power instabilities or unacceptable power
spikes, or prevent the mitigation of an ATWS event. (Reference Enclosure 1 [of the licensee's submittal], Proposed
Change 1). 

The ATWS-RPT aids in maintaining the level above the top of the active fuel. The reduction of core flow reduces the neutron
flux and thermal power and, therefore, the rate of coolant boil-off. However, the setpoint reduction does not significantly
reduce the margin of safety since a substantial margin remains to the top of the active fuel. 

For non-ATWS events, delaying the RPT will provide a slight improvement in the current ECCS-LOCA analysis, thereby
improving the margin of safety. 

The margin of safety for transients is not reduced because plant transient (MCPR) analyses do not take credit for the
ATWS-RPT trip. 

Proposed Change 2

Proposed Change 2 does not involve a significant hazards consideration, because it does not:

1. Involve a significant increase in the probability of occurrence or the consequences of a previously analyzed accident.


Allowing a recirculation pump restart within 30 minutes of a trip, when the temperature differential is unknown,
will not increase the probability of occurrence of a previously analyzed accident because this change does not physically
alter the RCPB. Additionally, the proposed change does not alter the design or function of any safety-related systems.


Furthermore, no recirculation system equipment is being changed as a result of this amendment. The start circuitry
and trip circuitry remain[s] unaffected. Operation of the recirculation system with the reactor at power is also
unaffected. As a result, the probability of the chapter 14 and 15 events dealing with the recirculation system are
not increased; i.e., trip of one or both recirculation pumps, recirculation pump seizure, recirculation flow controller
failure, etc. 

The purpose of the 145
&cir;F temperature differential requirement is to avoid thermal shock caused by hot water on the cold CRD stub tubes
during recirculation pump restart. If the temperature differential is unable to be determined, restart within 30
minutes of the trip will not increase the probability or severity of thermal fatigue on the stub tubes. As discussed
in Enclosure 1, Basis for Proposed Change 2, stratification will not develop within a 30-minute period following
pump trip, thus, the temperature differential will not exceed 145
&cir;F. Additional caveats are provided to insure the required temperature differential is met. These involve certain
conditions of ECCS injection, feedwater temperature, and drive flow. 

General Electric verified that this provision for recirculation pump restart will not affect any plant safety analysis,
including radiological analysis. Therefore, the consequences of previously analyzed events are not increased.


2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.

The proposed recirculation pump restart provisions do not introduce any new plant operating modes, accident scenarios,
or equipment failure modes. All other requirements for recirculation pump restart; e.g., those addressing equipment
protection and power oscillations, will continue to apply. 

3. Involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. 
The 145
&cir;F differential temperature requirement is in place to avoid thermal fatigue on the CRD stub tubes and the in-core
housing welds. Allowing the early restart with the listed caveats, when temperature indication is not available,
is acceptable because the conditions for re-start insure that a stratified condition has not yet developed. Thus,
the cooler vessel structures at the vessel bottom will not experience a severe thermal shock resulting from exposure
to hot water following the pump restart. 

This change will actually aid in preventing the development of a stratified condition, since the recirculation pumps
will be restarted before a stratified condition can develop, thereby helping to maintain RCPB integrity. In the past,
it has often been necessary to depressurize the RPV [reactor pressure vessel] to atmospheric pressure before the
required temperature differential was met. Proposed Change 2 should reduce the number of times depressurization
is required, thus avoiding unnecessary thermal cycles on the RPV. Therefore, the margin of safety regarding the protection
of RPV components from severe thermal stresses, and the integrity of the RCPB has not been reduced, and may actually
increase. 

The margin of safety in existing plant analyses is not reduced, because none of the analyses are adversely affected
as a result of allowing the pump restart within 30 minutes of the RPT, as indicated in GE's review of plant transient
and accident analyses. 
 


The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves
no significant hazards consideration.
Local Public Document Room location: 

Appling County Public Library, 301 City Hall Drive, Baxley, Georgia 31513 


Attorney for licensee: 

Ernest L. Blake, Jr., Esquire, Shaw, Pittman, Potts and Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037


NRC Project Director: 

Herbert N. Berkow



Georgia Power Company, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, Municipal Electric Authority of Georgia, City of Dalton,
Georgia, Docket Nos. 50-424 and 50-425, Vogtle Electric Generating Plant (VEGP), Units 1 and 2, Burke County, Georgia




Date of amendment request: 

October 3, 1994


Description of amendment request: 

This amendment would replace the reactor coolant system heatup and cooldown limitations for VEGP Units 1 and 2, contained
in Technical Specification figures 3.4-2a through 3.4-3b, and the maximum allowable nominal power-operated relief
valve (PORV) setpoint for the cold overpressure protection system. These changes are the results of new analyses
that account for the nonconservatisms identified in NRC Information Notice 93-58, the results of reactor pressure
vessel surveillance capsule examinations, and recently issued ASME Code 
Case N-514. 


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:



Conformance of the proposed amendment with the standards for a determination of no significant hazards, as defined
in the three factor test of 10 CFR 50.92, is shown in that the proposed amendment:
 
1. Does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.

The revised heatup and cooldown limits and PORV setpoints ensure that the Appendix G pressure/temperature limits
are not exceeded and therefore, help ensure that RCS integrity is maintained. The changes do not result in a condition
where the design, material, and construction standards of the RCS are altered. In addition, the safety function of
the COMS (cold over-pressure mitigation system), which is related to accident mitigation, has not been degraded.
Therefore, the probability of an accident is not increased by the PORV setpoint change.

The changes do not adversely affect the integrity of the RCS such that its function in the control of radiological consequences
is affected. In addition, the changes do not affect any fission barrier. The changes do not degrade or prevent the response
of the COMS or other safety-related system to accident scenarios, as described in FSAR chapter 15. In addition, the
changes do not alter any assumption previously made in the radiological consequence evaluations nor affect the mitigation
of the radiological consequences of an accident described in the FSAR. Therefore, the consequences of an accident
previously evaluated in the FSAR will not be increased.

Thus, operation of VEGP Units 1 and 2 in accordance with the proposed license amendment, does not involve a significant
increase in the probability or consequences of any accident previously evaluated.

2. Does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.

The changes do not cause the initiation of any accident nor create any new credible limiting single failure for safety-related
systems and components. The changes do not result in any event previously deemed incredible being made credible.
As such, it does not create the possibility of an accident different than any evaluated in the FSAR.

The changes do not have any effect on the ability of the safety-related systems to perform their intended safety functions.
The changes do not create failure modes that could adversely impact safety-related equipment. Therefore, it will
not create the possibility of a malfunction of equipment important to safety different than previously evaluated
in the FSAR. Thus, the proposed license amendment does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident
from any accident previously evaluated.

3. Does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.

The evaluation has shown that the PORV setpoints ensure that the Appendix G pressure/temperature limits are not exceeded.
The analysis to support the proposed PORV setpoint change demonstrates that the appropriate criteria, including
that of ASME Code Case N-514, are met for the postulated RCS pressures and temperatures. An adequate margin of safety
against vessel failure is assured, in part, by the safety factors identified in Appendix G to Section III of the ASME
Boiler and Pressure Vessel Code, and [in] the basis for ASME Code Case N-514 as well as [in the] added margin to prevent
lifting of the PORVs. The heatup and cooldown limits are designed to prevent nonductile failure of the reactor vessel
and take into account the results of surveillance capsule Y on the reactor vessel materials for VEGP Unit 1. The actuation
of the safety-related components and responses of the safety-related systems will remain as modeled in the safety
analyses. The changes will have no adverse [effect] on the availability, operability, or performance of the COMS.
Therefore, the changes will not reduce the margin of safety, as described in the bases to any Technical Specification.

Thus, [this] proposed license amendment does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves
no significant hazards consideration.


Local Public Document Room location: 

Burke County Public Library, 412 Fourth Street, Waynesboro, Georgia 30830. 


Attorney for licensee: 

Mr. Arthur H. Domby, Troutman Sanders, NationsBank Plaza, Suite 5200, 600 Peachtree Street, NE., Atlanta, Georgia
30308


NRC Project Director: 

Herbert N. Berkow



Gulf States Utilities Company, Cajun Electric Power Cooperative, and Entergy Operations, Inc., Docket No. 50-458,
River Bend Station, Unit 1, West Feliciana Parish, Louisiana




Date of amendment request: 

January 14, 1994, as supplemented by letter dated November 10, 1994.


Description of amendment request: 

The proposed amendment would revise the technical specifications (TSs) by removing component lists from the TSs
in accordance with NRC Generic Letter (GL) 91-08 and by removing the schedule for withdrawal of reactor vessel material
specimen capsules from the TSs in accordance with GL 91-01. This proposed amendment was originally noticed in the


Federal Register 

on May 23, 1994, (59 FR 26675). The licensee's letter dated November 10, 1994, provides clarification of the wording
in the proposed TSs and does not change the proposed determination that the amendment request involves no significant
hazards consideration. However, the notice is being repeated here.


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:



Does the change involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated?

The proposed change will not result in any hardware or operating changes. The proposed change is based upon Generic
Letters 91-01 and 91-08 and merely removes component lists, removes details relating to the component lists, provides
clarifying information supporting the removal of the component listings, or removes details (which are considered
administrative) that are no longer applicable to the Technical Specifications. The components listed in the affected
Technical Specifications are assumed in the mitigation of accident and transient events. The removal of tabular
component listings from the Technical Specifications does not impact affected component OPERABILITY requirements.
Technical Specifications will continue to require the components to be OPERABLE. Action statements and surveillance
requirements for the components will also remain in the Technical Specifications. The tabular component lists are
relocated to the Technical Requirements Manual which will be in accordance with the change control provisions specified
in the Administrative Controls Section of the Technical Specifications (Specification 6.5.2). Therefore, this
change is administrative in nature and does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences
of an accident previously evaluated.

Does the change create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated?

The proposed change does not necessitate a physical alteration of the plant (no new or different type of equipment
will be installed) or changes to parameters governing normal plant operation. The proposed change will not impose
any different requirements and adequate control of information will be maintained. No new failure modes are introduced.
Therefore, this proposed change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident
previously evaluated.

Does the change involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety?
 
The proposed change will not reduce a margin of safety because it has no impact on any safety analysis assumption. The
proposed changes do not alter the scope of equipment currently required to be OPERABLE or subject to surveillance
testing, nor do the proposed changes affect any instrument setpoints or equipment safety functions. Therefore the
change does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves
no significant hazards consideration.


Local Public Document Room location: 

Government Documents Department, Louisiana State University, Baton Rouge, Louisiana 70803


Attorney for licensee: 

Mark Wetterhahn, Esq., Winston  Strawn, 1400 L Street, N.W., Washington, D.C. 20005


NRC Project Director: 

William D. Beckner



IES Utilities Inc., Docket No. 50-331, Duane Arnold Energy Center, 
Linn County, Iowa




Date of amendment request: 

November 10, 1994


Description of amendment request: 

The proposed amendment revises the Duane Arnold Energy Center (DAEC) Technical Specification (TS) Section 3.2.A
to refer to the Offsite Dose Assessment Manual (ODAM) for the setpoint of the Offgas Stack Radiation Monitor and makes
the ``Applicable Operating Mode'' and the ``Action'' statements for these instruments consistent with the required
function. The Action statement for the other instruments which initiate Secondary Containment isolation is also
revised to be consistent with the current practice and with the function of those instruments. The Basis is also revised
to add further description of the function and requirements.


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is provided below:



1) The proposed amendment will not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident
previously evaluated because the instruments will still be required to be operable to initiate an isolation at a setpoint
which will assure that the offsite dose limits are preserved, as designed, or else administrative controls will be
established for the venting of primary containment. Through either means, offsite releases will be maintained within
the limits established in the ODAM. The change to the applicable operating mode simply will require that the instruments
be operable when they are assumed to be operable in previously analyzed accidents. The change to the required action
when the TS requirement cannot be met will assure that the flow path from containment is isolated or that positive control
is established so that any offsite radioactive gaseous release is within the limits analyzed in the ODAM.

2) The proposed amendment will not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously
evaluated because the affected instruments are inputs to the secondary containment isolation and the revised specification
will assure that they are operable or adequately compensated when they are assumed to perform their function. The
instruments initiate a secondary containment isolation in the event that high radiation levels are detected in the
monitored effluent.

3) The proposed amendment will not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety because the revised applicability
statement will assure that the instruments are operable when they are required to perform their function. The proposed
compensatory action allows administrative control of the isolation valves when the instruments are inoperable
and it is necessary to continue venting. This allowance recognizes that venting is a controlled evolution and that
operator action would be adequate to prevent excessive releases in the event of high radioactivity in the offgas piping.
The revision to the setpoint will not affect system operation, but will continue to assure that the gaseous effluents
released are within the limits specified in the ODAM.

In summary, the proposed changes do not change the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated,
do not create the possibility for a new or different kind of accident and do not involve a reduction in the margin of safety.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this
review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to
determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration.


Local Public Document Room location: 

Cedar Rapids Public Library, 500 First Street, S.E., Cedar Rapids, Iowa 52401.


Attorney for licensee: 

Jack Newman, Kathleen H. Shea, Newman, Bouknight  Edgar, PC, 1615 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20036.


NRC Project Director: 

Leif J. Norrholm



Indiana Michigan Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-315 and 50-316, Donald C. Cook Nuclear Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Berrien
County, Michigan




Date of amendment requests: 

October 7, 1994


Description of amendment requests: 

The proposed amendments would remove the requirements for the Nuclear Safety and Design Review Committee (NSDRC)
to audit, and for the Plant Nuclear Safety Review Committee (PNSRC) to review, the Emergency and Security plans and
implementing procedures. The composition of the PNSRC and the NSDRC would also be revised to reflect organizational
changes. Changes would be made to the delegation of responsibility by the Site Vice President/Plant Manager, and
title corrections would be made on all pages affected by the above changes.


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:
We [the licensee] have evaluated the proposed T/S changes and have determined that the changes should involve no significant
hazards consideration. The proposed amendment involves changes to the administrative controls section of the T/Ss
only. Because all changes reflect organizational/title changes only or guidance from GL 93-07, they do not:



1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequence of an accident previously evaluated;

2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated; or

3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment requests involve
no significant hazards consideration.


Local Public Document Room location: 

Maud Preston Palenske MemorialLibrary, 500 Market Street, St. Joseph, Michigan 49085


Attorney for licensee: 

Gerald Charnoff, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Potts and Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW, Washington, DC 20037


NRC Project Director: 

John N. Hannon



Indiana Michigan Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-315 and 50-316, Donald C. Cook Nuclear Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Berrien
County, Michigan




Date of amendment requests: 

November 16, 1994


Description of amendment requests: 

The proposed amendments would allow core offload 100 hours after core subcriticality instead of the 168 hours currently
required. Also included in this submittal are minor typographical corrections to Figure 5.6-1, ``Normal Storage
Pattern (Mixed Three Zone), and Figure 5.6-2, ``Interim Storage Pattern (Checkerboard).


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:



We [the licensee] have evaluated the proposed T/S, editorial and clarification changes and have determined that
they do not represent a significant hazards consideration based on the criteria established in 10 CFR 50.92(c). Operation
of Cook Nuclear Plant in accordance with the proposed amendment will not:



(1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.

Although one of the proposed changes results in initiation of core offload earlier after subcriticality than is currently
allowed, it does not increase the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The bulk pool
water temperatures, fuel rod clad temperatures, and pool wall concrete temperatures will be within acceptable limits
as shown in Attachment 2 [of the November 16, 1994, submittal]. In addition, the subject change will not result in an
uncontrolled release of radiation to the environment and will not initiate an accident. The remaining changes are
editorial in nature and have no [e]ffect on probability or consequences of a postulated accident.

(2) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from an accident previously evaluated.

As previously stated, the earlier fuel movement change will not result in bulk pool water, fuel rod clad, or concrete
temperatures which would initiate bulk pool boiling, challenge fuel rod integrity or jeopardize the structural
integrity of the pool. This change will also have no impact on the criticality, structural, seismic, or dropped assembly
accident analysis previously performed and accepted by the NRC. Consequently, the proposed T/S change does not create
the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously analyzed. The remaining changes have no
[e]ffect on [the] nature or probability of a postulated accident.

(3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.

The proposed change for earlier fuel movement will not result in bulk pool water temperatures, fuel rod clad temperatures
or concrete temperatures which would initiate bulk pool boiling, challenge fuel rod integrity or jeopardize the
structural integrity of the pool. This proposed change will not affect the results of any other analysis associated
with the spent fuel pool. It is, therefore, concluded that this change poses no significant reduction in a margin of
safety. The remaining changes have no [e]ffect on the nature or probability of a postulated accident.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment requests involve
no significant hazards consideration.
Local Public Document Room location: 

Maud Preston Palenske Memorial Library, 500 Market Street, St. Joseph, Michigan 49085


Attorney for licensee: 

Gerald Charnoff, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Potts and Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW, Washington, DC 20037


NRC Project Director: 

John N. Hannon



Indiana Michigan Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-315 and 50-316, Donald C. Cook Nuclear Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Berrien
County, Michigan




Date of amendment requests: 

November 18, 1994


Description of amendment requests: 

The license amendment requests propose a change to Technical Specification (T/S) 4.0.5 for both units to delete the
wording ``except where specific written relief has been granted by the Commission pursuant to 10 CFR 50, Section 50.55a(g)(6)(i).''
This change, which is consistent with guidance in the November 1993 draft NUREG-1482, ``Guidelines for Inservice
Testing at Nuclear Power Plants,'' would allow the licensee to implement certain 10 CFR 50.55a relief requests while
the relief requests were being reviewed by the NRC.


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below: 


We [the licensee] have evaluated the proposed T/S change and have determined that the change involves no significant
hazards consideration. Operation of Cook Nuclear Plant in accordance with the proposed amendment will not:



(1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident.

The proposed amendment does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident
previously evaluated. The inspections required under Section XI are intended to show the operational readiness
of the applicable components, and exceptions to the Code are allowed. When taking relief from Code requirements,
alternate requirements are developed which provide a high level of confidence that components will perform their
intended function.

The proposed change does not alter the Code requirements or lessen our obligations under existing regulations. Its
only effect is to allow implementation of Code relief prior to obtaining NRC written approval. The proposed T/S change
is consistent with NUREG-1431, and, as such, has been found to be acceptable by the NRC. Therefore, we believe that
implementation of this change will not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of a previously
analyzed incident.

(2) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously analyzed.

The proposed amendment does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously evaluated.
Typical relief requests involve using alternative testing methods or increasing the time interval between tests.
Each proposed alternative must assure that the component will perform its intended function. The proposed change
involves no physical changes to the plant; therefore, we believe that implementation of this change will not introduce
a new of different kind of accident than previously analyzed.

(3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.

The proposed amendment does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident
previously evaluated. The inspections required under Section XI are intended to show the operational readiness
of the applicable components, and exceptions to the Code are allowed. When taking relief from Code requirements,
alternate requirements are developed which provide a high level of confidence that components will perform their
intended function.

The proposed change does not altar the Code requirements or lessen our obligations under existing regulations. Its
only effect is to allow implementation of Code relief prior to obtaining NRC written approval. The proposed T/S change
is consistent with NUREG-1431, and, as such, has been found to be acceptable by the NRC. Therefore, we believe that
implementation of this change will not result in a significant reduction of the margin of safety.



NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10
CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment requests involve no
significant hazards consideration.
Local Public Document Room location: 

Maud Preston Palenske Memorial Library, 500 Market Street, St. Joseph, Michigan 49085


Attorney for licensee: 

Gerald Charnoff, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Potts and Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW, Washington, DC 20037


NRC Project Director: 

John N. Hannon



Niagara Mohawk Power Corporation, Docket No. 50-410, Nine Mile Point Nuclear Station, Unit 2, Oswego County, New
York 




Date of amendment request: 

November 14, 1994


Description of amendment request: 

The proposed license amendment would revise Technical Specification 4.5.1.e.2.e) to reduce the leak rate test pressure
for the Automatic Depressurization System (ADS) nitrogen receiving tanks from 385 psig to 365 psig. This pressure
reduction would be made to reduce potential degradation of the rupture disk installed on each ADS nitrogen receiving
tank during periodic leak testing of the receiving tanks. Plant operating experience has shown that leak rate testing
at 385 psig occasionally results in inadvertent failure of the rupture disks. Testing at the reduced pressure would
be consistent with the manufacturer's recommendations.


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:





The operation of Nine Mile Point Unit 2, in accordance with the proposed amendment, will not involve a significant
increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.

The ADS is required to effect or support the safe shutdown of the reactor. This is accomplished by the blowdown of steam
from a group of seven designated ADS SRVs [safety/relief valves] to the suppression pool. The proposed change to the
test pressure does not affect any accident precursors. Therefore, the proposed change cannot increase the probability
of an accident previously evaluated.

In the event the nitrogen gas supply from the nitrogen gas storage tanks is lost, a minimum nitrogen pressure of 334
psig in the ADS nitrogen receiver tanks assures a five-day supply of nitrogen to the ADS accumulators. The proposed
change to Surveillance Requirement 4.5.1.e.2.e) would decrease the leak rate test pressure of the ADS nitrogen receiver
tanks from 385 psig to 365 psig. Since the proposed test pressure remains well above the design minimum pressure of
334 psig, the surveillance test continues to ensure that the actual leakage of the safety related ADS accumulator
pneumatic supply system is bounded by the leakage assumptions contained in the system design. In addition, the surveillance
test continues to ensure that the ADS nitrogen receiver tanks are capable of providing a 5-day supply of nitrogen to
the ADS accumulators. Therefore, the proposed change does not significantly increase the consequences of a previously
evaluated accident.

The operation of Nine Mile Point Unit 2, in accordance with the proposed amendment, will not create the possibility
of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.

The proposed leak rate test pressure of 365 psig for the ADS nitrogen receiver tanks is above the minimum design pressure
to assure a 5-day supply of nitrogen is available to the ADS accumulators if makeup from the high pressure nitrogen
gas storage tanks is lost. With the proposed change, the ADS will continue to perform its safety function of effecting
and supporting the safe shutdown of the reactor. The nitrogen receiving tank test pressure is not a precursor for any
new or different accident and the change does not affect the operation of the system in any way.
 
Accordingly, the proposed change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident
previously evaluated.

The operation of Nine Mile Point Unit 2, in accordance with the proposed amendment, will not involve a significant
reduction in a margin of safety.

The operation of the ADS SRVs, in conjunction with the 
LPCI [low pressure coolant injection] mode of RHR [residual heat removal system] and/or the LPCS [low pressure core
spray] system, functions as an alternative to the HPCS [high pressure core spray system] for protection against fuel
cladding damage upon a small break loss-of-coolant accident. The blowdown of steam by these SRVs depressurizes the
reactor, allowing injection by the low-pressure coolant injection sources. With the proposed change, the ADS will
continue to perform its intended safety function of effecting and supporting the safe shutdown of the reactor as an
alternate to the HPCS. The proposed test pressure of 365 psig remains well above the minimum acceptable pressure for
the nitrogen receiver tanks of 334 psig. Therefore, the change will not involve a significant reduction in the margin
of safety.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant
hazards consideration. 
Local Public Document Room location: 

Reference and Documents Department, Penfield Library, State University of New York, Oswego, New York 13126.


Attorney for licensee: 

Mark J. Wetterhahn, Esquire, Winston  Strawn, 1400 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20005-3502. 


NRC Project Director: 

Michael J. Case



Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al., Docket No. 50-336, Millstone Nuclear Power Station, Unit No. 2, New London
County, Connecticut




Date of amendment request: 

November 30, 1994


Description of amendment request: 

The proposed amendment would modify the Technical Specifications by adding a footnote to Limiting Conditions for
Operation (LCOs) 3.8.1.1.b and 3.8.1.2.b which will denote that 24,000 gallons of fuel oil is capable of supporting
the operation of one emergency diesel generator (EDG) for at least 4 days and the other EDG for 1 hour with the EDGs loaded
to the continuous rated load of 2750 kW. 

Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:



...The proposed changes do not involve a significant hazards consideration because the changes would not:



1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.
 
The proposed changes to LCOs 3.8.1.1.b and 3.8.1.2.b and Bases Section 3/4.8 will revise the Millstone Unit No. 2 design
requirements regarding the volume of EDG fuel oil which is required to be stored onsite. The new rationale indicates
that 24,000 gallons of safety-related fuel oil would support the operation of one EDG for at least four days with the
other EDG running for at least one hour. These run-times assume the EDGs are loaded to the continuous rated loading
of 2750 kW.

The proposed changes have no effect on EDG operation and reliability. They provide additional operational flexibility,
because the EDG loading can be varied without the EDG minimum run-time being altered. Also, an EDG run-time of at least
four days provides significant time to replenish fuel oil from onsite and offsite sources even in the event of a hurricane
or seismic event.

Based on the above, there is no effect on the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.

2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.

The EDGs are required to operate in response to a loss of offsite power. The proposed changes to LCOs 3.8.1.1.b and 3.8.1.2.b
and Bases Section 3/4.8 do not change the manner in which the EDGs respond to a design basis accident. Also, the proposed
changes do not introduce any new failure mechanisms. Therefore, the proposed changes do not create the possibility
of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.

3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. 

The proposed changes to LCOs 3.8.1.1.b and 3.8.1.2.b and Bases Section 3/4.8 have no effect on EDG operation and reliability.
They provide additional operational flexibility, because the EDG loading can be varied without the EDG minimum run-time
being altered.

An EDG run-time of at least four days provides significant time to replenish EDG fuel oil via onsite or offsite sources
even in the event of a hurricane of seismic event. EPIP 4400 requires that the need to order EDG fuel oil be evaluated
within four hours of a loss of offsite power event. Also, the high reliability of the electrical grid and the high probability
that offsite power would be restored within 24 hours reduces the need to rely on extended EDG operation. 

Millstone Unit No. 2 has more margin than is indicated by the new design requirements. The EDG run-time will be significantly
greater than four days, because the electrical loading on the EDGs will be less than the continuous rated loading,
and electrical loads will be shed through normal recovery actions following a design basis accident.

Based on the above, the proposed changes do not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves
no significant hazards consideration.
Local Public Document Room location: 

Learning Resource Center, Three Rivers Community-Technical College, Thames Valley Campus, 574 New London Turnpike,
Norwich, CT 06360.


Attorney for licensee: 

Ms. L. M. Cuoco, Senior Nuclear Counsel, Northeast Utilities Service Company, Post Office Box 270, Hartford, CT 06141-0270.


NRC Project Director: 

Phillip F. McKee



Northern States Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-282 and 50-306, Prairie Island Nuclear Generating Plant, Unit Nos.
1 and 2, Goodhue County, Minnesota




Date of amendment requests: 

July 11, 1994


Description of amendment requests: 

The proposed amendments would change license condition 2.C.4 of each license to conform to the standard fire protection
license condition as stated in Generic Letter (GL) 86-10, ``Implementation of Fire Protection Requirements.''
In addition, the amendments would delete the fire protection program elements from the Technical Specifications
and incorporate, by reference, the NRC-approved Fire Protection Program and major commitments, including the fire
hazards analysis, into the Updated Safety Analysis Report. Guidance for these proposed changes is also provided
in GL 88-12, ``Removal of Fire Protection Requirements from Technical Specifications.''


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:



(1) The proposed amendment[s] will not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of [an]
accident previously evaluated.

The requested changes are administrative in nature in that they move fire protection requirements from the Technical
Specifications to the Fire Protection Program and associated implementing procedures following the guidance provided
in GL 86-10 and GL 88-12. The requested changes will not revise the requirements for fire protection equipment operability,
testing or inspections. The amendment would give added responsibility to the Operations Committee for review of
the Fire Protection Program in accordance with the guidance given in GL 86-10 and 88-12 including special reporting
requirements associated with limiting conditions for operation for fire protection systems.

The proposed changes do not involve any change to the configuration or method of operation of any plant equipment that
is used to mitigate the consequences of an accident, nor do they affect any assumptions or conditions in any of the accident
analyses. Since the accident analyses remain bounding, their radiological consequences are not adversely affected.

Therefore, the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated are not affected.

(2) The proposed amendment[s] will not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident
previously analyzed.

The requested changes are administrative in nature in that they move fire protection requirements from the Technical
Specifications to the Fire Protection Program and associated implementing procedures following the guidance provided
in GL 86-10 and GL 88-12. The requested changes will not revise the requirements for fire protection equipment operability,
testing or inspections. The amendment would give added responsibility to the Operations Committee for review of
the Fire Protection Program in accordance with the guidance given in GL 86-10 and 88-12 including special reporting
requirements associated with limiting conditions for operation for fire protection systems.

The proposed changes do not involve any change to the configuration or method of operation of any plant equipment that
is used to mitigate the consequences of an accident.

Therefore, the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated would not
be created.

(3) The proposed amendment[s] will not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety.

The requested changes are administrative in nature in that they move fire protection requirements from the Technical
Specifications to the Fire Protection Program and associated implementing procedures following the guidance provided
in GL 86-10 and GL 88-12. The requested changes will not revise the requirements for fire protection equipment operability,
testing or inspections. The amendment would give added responsibility to the Operations Committee for review of
the Fire Protection Program in accordance with the guidance given in GL 86-10 and 88-12 including special reporting
requirements associated with limiting conditions for operation for fire protection systems.

Therefore, a significant reduction in the margin of safety would not be involved.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment requests involve
no significant hazards consideration.


Local Public Document Room location: 

Minneapolis Public Library, Technology and Science Department, 300 Nicollet Mall, Minneapolis, Minnesota 55401


Attorney for licensee: 

Jay Silberg, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Potts, and Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW, Washington, DC 20037


NRC Project Director: 

John N. Hannon



Omaha Public Power District, Docket No. 50-285, Fort Calhoun Station, 
Unit No. 1, Washington County, Nebraska




Date of amendment request: 

November 11, 1994


Description of amendment request: 

The proposed amendment to the Technical Specifications (TSs) would make administrative changes to TS 5.2 and 5.5.
These changes reflect organizational changes in OPPD senior management, delete specific titles of personnel on
the Safety Audit and Review Committee (SARC) and Plant Review Committee (PRC), and make changes to SARC reviews and
audits.


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:
 


(1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.

The proposed changes are administrative changes to reflect organizational changes in Omaha Public Power District
(OPPD) Senior Management, remove specific titles from the membership of the Plant Review Committee (PRC) and the
Safety Audit and Review Committee (SARC), add minor clarifications to SARC reviews and audits and delete statements
concerning the frequency of SARC audits from the Technical Specifications (TS).

The proposed change to revise the overall corporate responsibility for plant nuclear safety from the Senior Vice
President to Vice President is administrative in nature as it only reflects an organizational change. Section 12
of the Updated Safety Analysis Report describes the management structure and reporting responsibilities of OPPD.
Section 12 provides an organizational chart to differentiate the Vice President in charge of nuclear activities
from other Vice Presidents within OPPD. Therefore, changing the corporate reporting responsibility does not involve
a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.

The proposed changes to the membership of the PRC and SARC are administrative in nature since only the specific titles
of the members are being removed from the TS. The management level and expertise of personnel who are PRC or SARC members
is not being changed. The review of plant operations is still required to be in compliance with ANSI N18.7-1976 and
Regulatory Guide 1.33, Revision 2, as committed to in the Fort Calhoun Station Quality Assurance (QA) Program. Any
changes in the QA Program which reduce the effectiveness of the program must be approved by the NRC in accordance with
10 CFR 50.54(a)(3). Therefore, the proposed changes to the membership of the PRC and SARC do not involve a significant
increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.
 
Clarifications of SARC reviews and audits and the deletion of SARC audit frequencies from the TS are administrative
changes. The audit frequencies are required by the NRC approved QA Program and any changes that could reduce the effectiveness
of the QA Program must be approved by the NRC in accordance with 10 CFR 50.54(a)(3). Therefore, the clarifications
and deletion of the specific audit frequencies do not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences
of an accident previously evaluated.

(2) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.

The proposed changes are administrative in nature to reflect organizational changes in OPPD Senior Management,
remove specific titles from the membership of the PRC and SARC, provide minor clarifications of SARC reviews and audits
and delete statements concerning the frequency of SARC audits from the TS. The proposed changes do not revise any equipment
setpoints, change the manner in which any plant equipment is operated, or propose any new operating modes. Therefore,
the proposed changes do not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously
evaluated.

(3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.
 
The proposed changes revise organizational and administrative requirements contained within the Administrative
Controls section of the TS. The proposed changes do not revise any equipment setpoints, change the manner in which
any plant equipment is operated, or propose any new operating modes. Therefore, the proposed changes do not involve
a significant reduction in a margin of safety.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves
no significant hazards consideration.


Local Public Document Room location: 

W. Dale Clark Library, 215 South 15th Street, Omaha, Nebraska 68102


Attorney for licensee: 

LeBoeuf, Lamb, Leiby, and MacRae, 1875 Connecticut Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20009-5728


NRC Project Director: 

Theodore R. Quay



Pennsylvania Power and Light Company, Docket Nos. 50-387 and 50-388 Susquehanna Steam Electric Station, Units 1
and 2, Luzerne County, Pennsylvania




Date of amendment request: 

October 28, 1994


Description of amendment request: 

The proposed changes to the Technical Specifications (TS) for the two units would add reference #20 (Unit 1) and reference
#18 (Unit 2) to Section 6.9.3.2 as ``PL-NF-90-001, Supplement 1, 'Application of Reactor Analysis Methods for BWR
Design and Analysis: Loss of Feedwater Heating Changes and Use of RETRAN MOD 5.1', September 1994''. These changes
would add changes to the methodology that the licensee is using to perform its nuclear fuel reload analysis for the
two units. 


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:



I. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.

Incorporation of these proposed minor changes into PPL's NRC approved methodology for performing reload licensing
analysis is considered to be an enhancement to the currently approved methodology. Upgrading of the RETRAN code allows
for taking advantage of state-of-the-art technology, while utilization of the generic correlation for the LOFWH
event supports consistency in licensing analysis performance. Results of incorporating these changes will not
significantly increase the probability or the consequences of an accident previously evaluated.

II. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.

As stated above, the incorporation of these minor changes are considered enhancements, allowing PPL to more
efficiently and cost effectively continue to perform future reload licensing analysis. Therefore, the incorporation
of these changes will not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously
evaluated.
 
III. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.

In addition to the extensive testing perform by EPRI, PPL has performed its own comparison tests utilizing RETRAN
MOD005.1 in place of MOD004 for four licensing transients that use the RETRAN code. Results of this comparison were
essentially the same for both codes and support this proposed change. Also, the Loss of Feedwater Heating event is
not a limiting event for establishing MCPR Operating Limits for Susquehanna. Therefore, the incorporation of these
changes will have no impact on current safety margins, nor will they involve a significant reduction in the margin
to safety.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves
no significant hazards consideration. 


Local Public Document Room location: 

Osterhout Free Library, Reference Department, 71 South Franklin Street, Wilkes-Barre, Pennsylvania 18701 

Attorney for licensee: 

Jay Silberg, Esquire, Shaw, Pittman, Potts and Trowbridge, 2300 N Street NW., Washington, DC 20037


NRC Project Director: 

John F. Stolz



Pennsylvania Power and Light Company, Docket Nos. 50-387 and 50-388 Susquehanna Steam Electric Station, Units 1
and 2, Luzerne County, Pennsylvania




Date of amendment request: 

October 28, 1994


Description of amendment request: 

The proposed changes to the Technical Specifications (TS) for the two units would make a number of administrative
changes. These would include changing the title of the positions of Superintendent of Plant to the Vice President-Nuclear
Operations, and changing the title of Vice-President-Nuclear Operations to Senior Vice President-Nuclear for
the listing of the assignment of certain duties in various sub-sections of Section 6.0 of the TS. Other proposed changes
would be the deletion of a number of footnotes indicating times, dates, and events that are no longer applicable, the
addition of a footnote to Section 6.5.1.2 indicating that the Station Duty Manager shall act as a PORC [Plant Operations
Review Committee] chairman in the absence of the Vice President-Nuclear Operations, and the change of the Semiannual
Radioactive Effluent Release Report to Annual Radioactive Effluent Release Report in Table 4.11.2.1.2-1 footnote
g.


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:



I. This proposal does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously
evaluated.

The proposal to change the title of Superintendent of Plant to Vice President-Nuclear Operations and Vice President-Nuclear
Operations to Senior Vice President-Nuclear (for certain duties) is administrative in nature and does not compromise
the minimum qualifications or training required for these positions. Therefore, the proposed change does not involve
a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. 
The proposed change for the removal of footnotes that reference periods of time, dates, and events that have since
past is justified based on the fact that they are no longer applicable. Because operators must perform unnecessary
applicability reviews on these no longer applicable footnotes, removing the footnotes decreases the potential
for confusion and incorrect actions. Therefore, the proposed change does not involve a significant increase in the
probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. 
The proposed change to add a footnote indicating the Station Duty Manager shall act as PORC chairman in the absence
of the Vice President-Nuclear Operations will ensure continuous leadership of PORC and will enhance performance
by ensuring a responsible individual is available during all shifts. Therefore, the proposed change does not involve
a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.

Changing the Semiannual Radioactive Effluent Release Report to Annual Radioactive Effluent Release Report was
previously approved in Amendment 128 to Unit 1 and Amendment 97 to Unit 2. Incorporating this change into footnote
g of Table 4.11.2.1.2-1 will maintain accuracy and consistency. Therefore, the proposed change does not involve
a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.

II. This proposal does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously
evaluated.

The proposal to change the title of Superintendent of Plant to Vice President-Nuclear Operations and Vice President-Nuclear
Operations to Senior Vice President-Nuclear (for certain duties) is administrative in nature and does not compromise
the minimum qualifications or training required for these positions. Also, the change does not diminish the responsibilities
or functions of these positions. Therefore, the proposed change does not create the possibility of a new or different
kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.

The proposed change for the removal of footnotes that reference periods of time, dates, and events that have since
past is justified based on the fact that they are no longer applicable. Because operators must perform unnecessary
applicability reviews on them, removing the no longer applicable footnotes decreases the potential for confusion
and incorrect actions, thereby enhancing the safe operation of Susquehanna SES. Therefore, the proposed change
does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.

The proposed change to add a footnote indicating the Station Duty Manager shall act as PORC chairman in the absence
of the Vice President-Nuclear Operations will ensure continuous leadership of PORC and will enhance performance
by ensuring a responsible individual is available during all shifts. Therefore, the proposed change does not create
the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.

Changing Semiannual Radioactive Effluent Release Report to Annual Radioactive Effluent Release Report was previously
approved in Amendment 128 to Unit 1 and Amendment 97 to Unit 2. Incorporating this change into footnote g of Table 4.11.2.1.2-1
will maintain accuracy and consistency. Therefore, the proposed change does not create the possibility of a new or
different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.

III. This change does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.

For the reasons discussed in items I and II above, as well as the enclosed Safety Assessment, the proposed change does
not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. 


The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves
no significant hazards consideration. 


Local Public Document Room location: 

Osterhout Free Library, Reference Department, 71 South Franklin Street, Wilkes-Barre, Pennsylvania 18701 

Attorney for licensee: 

Jay Silberg, Esquire, Shaw, Pittman, Potts and Trowbridge, 2300 N Street NW., Washington, DC 20037


NRC Project Director: 

John F. Stolz



Pennsylvania Power and Light Company, Docket Nos. 50-387 and 50-388 Susquehanna Steam Electric Station, Units 1
and 2, Luzerne County, Pennsylvania




Date of amendment request: 

October 28, 1994


Description of amendment request: 

The amendment would delete the requirements for chlorine detection and the associated Bases from the Technical Specifications
for each unit as a result of the removal of bulk quantities of gaseous chlorine from the Susquehanna Steam Electric
Station. Specifically, Sections 3.3.7.8 and the associated Surveillance Requirements in Section 4.3.7.8 would
be deleted. In addition, Bases 3/4.3.7.8 would also be deleted.


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:



I. This proposal does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously
evaluated.

Review of the various design basis accidents identified in Chapter 15 of the Susquehanna SES Final Safety Analysis
Report (FSAR) concluded that none of these accidents are affected by deletion of the chlorine detection requirements
from Technical Specifications. With the elimination of bulk quantities of gaseous chlorine from use at Susquehanna
SES the probability of control room inhabitability due to a gaseous chlorine release has actually decreased. Therefore,
this proposed change does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously
evaluated.

II. This proposal does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously
evaluated.

The proposed change involves only the deletion of the chlorine detection system Technical Specifications based
upon a plant modification to remove gaseous chlorine as a biocide from Susquehanna SES and replace it with a nonoxidizing
biocide. The release of chlorine from an off-site source is bounded by Reg. Guide 1.95 in that manual isolation capability
for the control room ventilation system is acceptable. Therefore, the proposed change does not create the possibility
of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.

III. This change does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.

The proposed change would not alter the margins of safety provided in the existing FSAR analysis (Sections 2.2.3.1.3
and 6.4) for chlorine release events since the basis for the existing margin of safety, which are the Reg. Guide 1.95
requirements, are not altered by the change. As stated above, since gaseous chlorine is no longer used for open cooling
water treatment at Susquehanna SES and since the nonoxidizing biocide is relatively nontoxic to humans, safety margin
has actually increased. Therefore, the proposed change does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves
no significant hazards consideration. 


Local Public Document Room location: 

Osterhout Free Library, Reference Department, 71 South Franklin Street, Wilkes-Barre, Pennsylvania 18701 

Attorney for licensee: 

Jay Silberg, Esquire, Shaw, Pittman, Potts and Trowbridge, 2300 N Street NW., Washington, DC 20037


NRC Project Director: 

John F. Stolz



Pennsylvania Power and Light Company, Docket Nos. 50-387 and 50-388 Susquehanna Steam Electric Station, Units 1
and 2, Luzerne County, Pennsylvania




Date of amendment request: 

November 11, 1994


Description of amendment request: 

The amendment would extend the Main Turbine Valve surveillance test interval from a weekly basis to no greater than
92 days for all Main Turbine Stop, Control, and Combined Intermediate Valves.


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:



I. This proposal does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously
evaluated.

The proposed Technical Specification change to a quarterly turbine inlet valve surveillance test interval is based
on maintaining the turbine missile generation probability within the NRC criteria as stated in Table 3.1 of NUREG-1048.
This, combined with the NRC acceptable strike-and-damage probability as specified in NUREG-1048, will keep the
probability of unacceptable damage to safety-related structures, systems, and components from turbine missiles
acceptably low (i.e., &lt;10

-7

) . Thus, the NRC acceptable risk rate of &lt;10

-7

/yr. is not changed and there is no increase in the probability of an accident previously evaluated. 
The proposed Technical Specification change to the turbine inlet valve surveillance interval does not effect the
sequence of events or the consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The surveillance interval does not affect
the strike and damage scenario of an accident previously evaluated. Thus, the radiological consequences of an accident
previously evaluated will not be increased.

II. This proposal does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously
evaluated.

The proposed Technical Specification change to the turbine inlet valve surveillance interval does not affect the
surveillance test characteristics. There are no new surveillance testing requirements. Surveillance testing
of these valves does not create the possibility for a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously
evaluated.
 
III. This change does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.

The proposed Technical Specification change to the turbine inlet valve surveillance interval is based on maintaining
the same margin of safety as previously determined by the NRC and does not reduce the margin of safety. In fact, the reduction
in the testing rate will reduce the potential for testing related transients, which have been credited with causing
18 reactor scrams in the period 1985 through 1992.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves
no significant hazards consideration. 


Local Public Document Room location: 

Osterhout Free Library, Reference Department, 71 South Franklin Street, Wilkes-Barre, Pennsylvania 18701 

Attorney for licensee: 

Jay Silberg, Esquire, Shaw, Pittman, Potts and Trowbridge, 2300 N Street NW., Washington, DC 20037


NRC Project Director: 

John F. Stolz



Philadelphia Electric Company, Public Service Electric and Gas Company, 
Delmarva Power and Light Company, and Atlantic City Electric Company, 
Dockets Nos. 50-277 and 50-278, Peach Bottom Atomic Power Station, 
Units Nos. 2 and 3, York County, Pennsylvania 
Date of application for amendments: November 14, 1994 




Description of amendment request: 

The proposed changes relocate audit topics and frequencies, Nuclear Review Board review requirements and requirements
associated with the independent Safety Engineering Group function from the Peach Bottom Atomic Power Station, Units
2 and 3 Technical Specifications to licensee controlled documents.


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:

1)

The proposed changes do not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously
evaluated because the changes relocate requirements from the TS to licensee controlled documents consistent with
the NRC Final Policy Statement on TS Improvements. Any changes to the licensee controlled documents will be evaluated
in accordance with 10 CFR 50.54(a) or 10 CFR 50.59 as appropriate. Therefore, these changes will not involve a significant
increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.

2) The proposed changes do not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously
evaluated because the changes will not alter the plant or the manner in which the plant is operated. The changes will
not involve a design change or introduce any new failure modes. The changes will not alter assumptions made in the safety
analysis and licensing basis. Adequate control of information will be maintained. Therefore, these changes will
not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.

2) The proposed changes do not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety because they have no impact on any
safety analysis assumptions. The requirements to be transposed from the TS to licensee controlled documents are
the same as the existing TS. Any future changes to licensee controlled documents will be evaluated in accordance with
10 CFR 50.54(a) or 10 CFR 50.59 as appropriate. Because the proposed changes are consistent with NUREG-1433, as modified
by approved generic change BWOG-09, and the change controls for proposed relocated details and requirements provide
an equivalent level of regulatory authority, revising the TS to reflect the approved level of detail and requirements
ensures no significant reduction in a margin of safety.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves
no significant hazards consideration. 


Local Public Document Room location: 

Government Publications Section, State Library of Pennsylvania, (REGIONAL DEPOSITORY) Education Building, Walnut
Street and Commonwealth Avenue, Box 1601, Harrisburg, Pennsylvania 17105.


Attorney for licensee: 

J. W. Durham, Sr., Esquire, Sr. V. P. and General Counsel, Philadelphia Electric Company, 2301 Market Street, Philadelphia,
Pennsylvania 19101


NRC Project Director: 

John F. Stolz 



Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-259, 50-260 and 50-296, Browns
Ferry Nuclear Plant, Units 1, 2 and 3, Limestone County, Alabama




Date of amendment request: 

November 15, 1994 (TS 350)


Description of amendment request: 

The proposed change would remove the frequency for each of the audits specified in the administrative controls section
of the technical specifications (TS). The requirements to perform the audits would be retained, but the frequency
for their performance would be controlled by a requirement to be added to the Nuclear Quality Assurance Plan. This
would require that the audits listed in the TS be performed on a biennial frequency. In addition, the proposed change
would remove the requirement to perform site Radiological Emergency Plan and Physical Security/Safeguard Contingency
Plan reviews and audits from the TS, since these requirements presently exist in the respective Plans. 


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:



TVA has concluded that operation of BFN units 1, 2, and 3 in accordance with the proposed change to the technical specifications
does not involve a significant hazards consideration. TVA's conclusion is based on its evaluation in accordance
with 10 CFR 50.91(a)(1), of the three standards set forth in 10 CFR 50.92(c). TVA's conclusion is based on the following:

1. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident
previously evaluated.

The likelihood that an accident will occur is neither increased or decreased by this Technical Specification change
which only affects review and audit frequencies. This Technical Specification change will not impact the function
or method of operation of plant equipment. Thus, there is not a significant increase in the probability of a previously
analyzed accident due to this change. No systems, equipment, or components are affected by the proposed change. Thus,
the consequences of a malfunction of equipment important to safety previously evaluated in the UFSAR are not increased
by this change.

The proposed change only affects review and audit frequencies. As such, the proposed change has no impact on accident
initiators or plant equipment, and thus, does not affect the probabilities or consequences of an accident.

Therefore, we conclude that this change does not significantly increase the probabilities or consequences of an
accident.

2. The proposed amendment does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously
evaluated.

The proposed changes do not involve changes to the physical plant or operations. Since program audits do not contribute
to accident initiation, a change related to audit functions cannot produce a new accident scenario or produce a new
type of equipment malfunction. Also, this change does not alter any existing accident scenarios. The proposed change
does not affect equipment or its operation, and, thus, does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of
accident. Therefore, the proposed change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident.

3. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.

The proposed change concerning conduct of reviews and audits does not directly affect plant equipment or operation.
Safety limits and limiting safety system settings are no affected by this proposed change.

Therefore, use of the proposed Technical Specification would not involve any reduction in the margin of safety.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves
no significant hazards consideration.


Local Public Document Room location: 

Athens Public Library, South Street, Athens, Alabama 35611


Attorney for licensee: 

General Counsel, Tennessee Valley Authority, 400 West Summit Hill Drive, ET llH, Knoxville, Tennessee 37902


NRC Project Director: 

Frederick J. Hebdon



Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-327 and 50-328, Sequoyah Nuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Hamilton County,
Tennessee




Date of amendment request: 

November 15, 1994 (TS 94-12)


Description of amendment request: 

The proposed change would remove the frequency for each of the audits specified in the administrative controls section
of the technical specifications (TS). The requirements to perform the audits would be retained, but the frequency
for their performance would be controlled by a requirement to be added to the Nuclear Quality Assurance Plan. This
would require that the audits listed in the TS be performed on a biennial frequency. In addition, the proposed change
would remove the requirement to perform site Radiological Emergency Plan and Physical Security/Safeguard Contingency
Plan reviews and audits from the TS, since these requirements presently exist in the respective Plans. 


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:



The standards used to arrive at a determination that a Technical Specification change request involves no significant
hazards consideration are included in the Commission's regulations, 10 CFR 50.92, which states that no significant
hazards considerations are involved if the operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendment would
not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated;
or (2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated; or (3)
involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. Each standard is addressed as follows:

1. Operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed technical specifications would not involve a significant
increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.

The likelihood that an accident will occur is neither increased or decreased by the Technical Specification change
which only affects review and audit frequencies. This Technical Specification change will not impact the function
or method of operation of plant equipment. Thus, there is not a significant increase in the probability of a previously
analyzed accident due to this change. No systems, equipment, or components are affected by the proposed changes.
Thus, the consequences of a malfunction of equipment important to safety previously evaluated in the FSAR are not
increased by this change.

The proposed change only affects review and audit frequencies. As such, the proposed change has no impact on accident
initiators or plant equipment, and thus, does not affect the probabilities or consequences of an accident. 
Therefore, we conclude that this change does not significantly increase the probabilities or consequences of an
accident.

2. Operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed technical specifications would not create the possibility
of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.

The proposed changes do not involve changes to the physical plant or operations. Since program audits do not contribute
to accident initiation, a change related to audit functions cannot produce a new accident scenario or produce a new
type of equipment malfunction. Also, this change does not alter any existing accident scenarios. The proposed change
does not affect equipment or its operation, and, thus, does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of
accident. Therefore, the proposed change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident.

3. Operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed technical specifications would not involve a significant
reduction in a margin of safety.

The proposed change concerning conduct of reviews and audits does not directly affect plant equipment or operation.
Safety limits and limiting safety system settings are no affected by this proposed change.

Therefore, use of the proposed Technical Specification would not involve any reduction in the margin of safety.



The NRC has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this
review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are 
satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards
consideration.


Local Public Document Room location: 

Chattanooga-Hamilton County Library, 1101 Broad Street, Chattanooga, Tennessee 37402


Attorney for licensee: 

General Counsel, Tennessee Valley Authority, 400 West Summit Hill Drive, ET 11H, Knoxville, Tennessee 37902


NRC Project Director: 

Frederick J. Hebdon 



Union Electric Company, Docket No. 50-483, Callaway Plant, Unit 1, Callaway County, Missouri





Date of amendment request: September 8, 1994

Description of amendment request: 

The proposed amendment would revise Technical Specification 4.2.2.2, 4.2.2.4, and 6.9.19 to incorporate a penalty
in the Core Operating Limit Report (COLR) to account for F

Q

 increases greater than 2 percent between measurements. 


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:



The proposed changes to the Technical Specifications do not involve a significant hazards consideration because
operation of Callaway Plant in accordance with these changes would not:

1) Involve a significant increase in the probability of occurrence or the consequences of an accident or malfunction
of equipment important to safety previously evaluated in the safety analysis report. There is no increase in the probability
of occurrence or the consequences of an accident. The removal of F

Q

(Z) penalty values from the Callaway Plant Technical Specifications and the creation of cycle-specific F

Q

(Z) values in the COLR has no influence or impact on the probability or consequences of any accident previously evaluated.
The cycle-specific F

Q

(Z) values, although not in Technical Specifications, will be followed in the operation of the Callaway Plant. The
proposed amendment still requires exactly the same actions to be taken when or if F

Q

(Z) limits are exceeded as is required by current Technical Specifications.

2) Create a possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously evaluated in the safety analysis
report. There is no new type of accident or malfunction created and the method and manner of plant operation will not
change. As stated earlier, the removal of the cycle-specific F

Q

(Z) value has no influence or impact, nor does it contribute in any way to the probability or consequences of an accident.
No safety-related equipment, safety function, or plant operation will be altered as a result of this proposed change.
The cycle-specific F

Q

(Z) values are calculated using NRC approved methods. The Technical Specifications will continue to require operation
within the required F

Q

(Z) limits and appropriate actions will be taken when or if limits are exceeded.

3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. This is based on the fact that no plant design changes are involved
and the method and manner of plant operation remains the same. The margin of safety is not affected by change and removal
of F

Q

(Z) penalty values from the Technical Specifications. The margin of safety presently provided by current Technical
Specifications remains unchanged. The current F

Q

(Z) limits remain unchanged and the current safety analysis limits remain valid and unaffected by this change. The
proposed amendment continues to require operation within the core limits as obtained from the NRC approved design
methodology and appropriate actions to be taken when or if F

Q

(Z) limits are violated remain unchanged.

Given the above discussions as well as those presented in the Safety Evaluation, the proposed change does not adversely
affect or endanger the health or safety of the general public or involve a significant safety hazard.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves
no significant hazards consideration.


Local Public Document Room location: 

Callaway County Public Library, 710 Court Street, Fulton, Missouri 65251.


Attorney for licensee: 

Gerald Charnoff, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Potts  Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, N.W., Washington, DC 20037


NRC Project Director: 

Leif J. Norrholm






Union Electric Company, Docket No. 50-483, Callaway Plant, Unit 1, Callaway County, Missouri







Date of amendment request: 

September 12, 1994




Description of amendment request: 

The proposed amendment would revise Technical Specification 3.7.1.1 (Tables 3.7-1 and 3.7-2). Tables 2.2-1 and
3.3-2, and Bases 3/4.7. Tables 3.7-1, 3.7-2, 3.3-2, and 2.2-1 would be revised to provide appropriate margin to relax
main steam line safety valve setpoint tolerance. Bases 3/4.7 would be revised to incorporate the methodology used
to determine the maximum allowable power level associated with inoperable main steam line safety valves.




Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below:





The proposed changes to the Technical Specifications do not involve a significant hazards consideration because
operation of Callaway Plant in accordance with these changes would not:

1. Involve a significant increase in the probability of occurrence or the consequences of an accident or malfunction
of equipment important to safety previously evaluated in the safety analysis report. The main steam line safety valves
are designed to mitigate transients by preventing overpressurization of the main steam system. The proposed change
does not alter this design basis. The revised analysis shows that the probability or

consequences of all previously analyzed accidents are not changed by increasing the setpoint tolerance of the safety
valves. Therefore, there is no increase in the probability of occurrence or the consequences of any accident.

2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously evaluated in the safety analysis
report. There is no new type of accident or malfunction created, the method and manner of plant operation will not change
nor is there a change in the method in which any safety related system performs its function. Any main steam safety valve
lifting at the extremes of the proposed tolerance will not result in low lift setpoint that is less than the normal no
load system pressure or a high lift setpoint that allows main steam system overpressurization.

3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. This is based on the fact that no plant design changes are involved
and the method and manner of plant operation remains the same. With the increased setpoint tolerance, the main steam
safety valves will still prevent pressure from exceeding 110 percent of design pressure in accordance with the ASME
code. All FSAR accident analysis conclusions remain valid and unaffected by this change.

Given the above discussions as well as those presented in the Safety Evaluation, the proposed change does not adversely
affect or endanger the health or safety of the general public or involve a significant safety hazard.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves
no significant hazards consideration.


Local Public Document Room location: 

Callaway County Public Library, 710 Court Street, Fulton, Missouri 65251.


Attorney for licensee: 

Gerald Charnoff, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Potts  Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, N.W., Washington, DC 20037 


NRC Project Director: 

Leif J. Norrholm 












Washington Public Power Supply System, Docket No. 50-397, Nuclear Project No. 2, Benton County, Washington









Date of amendment request: 

July 9, 1993, with supplemental information provided October 8, 1993, October 25, 1993, January 6, 1994, February
2, 1994, May 3, 1994, May 13, 1994, September 26, 1994, and October 12, 1994.




Description of amendment request: 

The proposed amendment would modify the operating license and several Technical Specifications (TS) to allow an
increase in licensed power level by 4.9%. This would raise the licensed power level from the current 3323 MWt to 3486
MWt, but will not affect the basic fuel design or fuel operating limits. The uprate in power will be accomplished by
expanding the existing power-to-flow map to allow an increase in core flow along the flow control lines, with an associated
increase in core power. The increased flow and power will also cause an increase in operating reactor vessel steam
dome pressure that will require an associated TS change.


Other TS changes proposed to reflect necessary modifications to address the power uprate are (1) an increase in the
average power range monitor (APRM) and flow biased scram and rod block monitor (RBM) setpoints, (2) an increase in
reactor steam pressure limits, (3) an increase in main steam line (MSL) isolation valve and tunnel high differential
temperature to reflect the increased operating pressure, (4) revised temperature/pressure limit curves to reflect
the higher neutron flux over vessel life, (5) an increase in calculated peak containment pressure, (6) an increase
in the pressure at which reactor core isolation cooling (RCIC) testing occurs, and (7) an increase in the safety relief
valve (SRV) setpoints.





The licensee, in the above reference letters, also proposed changes to the TS that are not associated with the power
uprate. These proposed changes are (1) a change of the reactor protection system and End-of-Cycle/Recirculation
Pump Trip (EOC/RPT) trip setpoint from a fixed to a variable setpoint based on power level, (2) an increase in the SRV
setpoint tolerance, and (3) an increase in the number of automatic depressurization system (ADS) valves that are
allowed out of service.






Although not part of the change to the license or associated TS, the licensee is also revising the bases to reflect the
TS changes and power uprate.








Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration.
The NRC staff has reviewed 
the licensee's analysis against the standards of 10 CFR 50.92 (c). The NRC staff's review is presented below: 








1. Does the amendment involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously
evaluated?






* [Increase in Rated Thermal Power from 3323 MWt to 3486 MWt]
Plant operation at a higher power level is accomplished by increasing reactor core flow along flow control lines to
achieve the desired increase in steam flow to the turbine/generator. The maximum allowable reactor recirculation
flow rate remains unchanged from the original plant design analysis. The increased reactor core flow requires a corresponding
increase in feedwater flow that remains well within the design of the feedwater system components. The increased
power also requires a small increase in reactor pressure. Safety relief valve and power, pressure, and flow-related
instrumentation trip setpoints are increased slightly to accommodate the power uprate, to maintain approximately
the same level of trip avoidance and safety system challenges as before the uprated power condition.
The plant is operated in the same manner at uprated power as it is at the currently licensed power level, including the
methods and sequences of system and component operation. Since the level of trip avoidance and safety system challenges
remains approximately the same, the frequency of operational responses to these events is not increased. Reactor
fuel operating limits, designed to protect the fuel cladding, are maintained and thus provide the same level of protection
as before the uprated power condition. The original design and regulatory criteria established for plant equipment,
including ASME code, IEEE standards, NEMA standards, and Regulatory Guide criteria, are still imposed and met for
operation at the uprated power level. In addition, the reactor vessel and internals, reactor connecting piping,
balance of plant piping, primary containment, and related systems and components still meet the pre-uprate design
and licensing criteria. The power uprate does not change the likelihood of failure of these systems or components.
Thus, the probability of an accident previously evaluated is not significantly affected by the proposed power uprate.
The consequences of postulated, power-dependent accidents are proportional to the power level assumed in the safety
analysis. This is because potential offsite doses increase proportionately to reactor power since the radiological
source term is directly proportional to reactor power. The meteorological factors are unaffected by the proposed
power uprate. The current accident analyses are based on 104.4% of original rated power. The accident analyses for
power uprate are based on 1.02 x 104.9% (or 107%) of original rated power. Thus, power uprate increases postulated
consequences of an accident by less than 3% over previous postulated consequences, while still remaining well within
the 10 CFR Part 100 limits. In addition, a spectrum of hypothetical accidents and transients were investigated for
power uprate, and the bounding events met the same regulatory criteria to which WNP-2 is currently licensed, including
Maximum Average Planar Linear Heat Generation Rate (MAPLHGR), Operating Limit Minimum Critical Power Ratio (OLMCPR),
10 CFR 50.46 and 10 CFR Part 50-Appendix K, for fuel cladding integrity, and containment criteria in 10 CFR Part 50-Appendix
A, Criterion 38 and Criterion 50.
The results of these analyses demonstrate that operation at the proposed power uprate level does not significantly
increase the probability or consequences of any accident previously evaluated.
* [Increase in the maximum allowable reactor steam dome operating pressure limit]
The operating pressure limit is increased by the same amount as the nominal operating pressure increase for power
uprate. This change to the dome operating pressure limit is consistent with and meets the current design criteria
used for evaluation of steady state operating conditions and for the most limiting event for vessel overpressure
protection. Operation at a higher pressure results in the plant operating closer to the criteria used in the design
analysis. However, since operation of the plant within design limits is considered to result in a very low probability
of failure of systems or components, this small increase in maximum operating pressure is considered to have a negligible
increase in failure probability. Thus the proposed change does not significantly increase the likelihood of failure
of existing systems or components, and does not significantly affect the probability of an accident previously evaluated.
The power uprate overpressure protection analysis results show the peak reactor pressure vessel (RPV) pressure
will remain below the ASME code limit, keeping any postulated radiological consequences within the bounds of existing
analyses. Thus the consequences of an accident previously evaluated are not significantly affected.
* [Increase in the average power range monitor (APRM) and flow biased scram and rod block monitor (RBM) setpoints]
These scrams and rod blocks are designed to prevent fuel damage due to power during postulated events or anticipated
operational occurrences. The setpoints for these scrams and rod blocks are increased by the same amount of the proposed
increase in licensed power. The change in these setpoints does not affect the operation of any system or component,
nor does it affect the circuitry that provides the protective function. Thus the increase in setpoints does not affect
the probability of any accident previously evaluated.
The increased setpoints maintain the same difference between licensed power level and scram setpoints, and between
the scram line and rod block lines on the extended load line limit curve. The increased setpoints result in higher postulated
source terms for accidents previously analyzed. The proposed change does not affect the response or operation of
mitigative equipment. The licensee's analyses supporting power uprate demonstrate that the increased values do
not significantly affect the consequences of an accident. The proposed change also maintains the current level of
scram avoidance with associated avoidance of unnecessary challenges to plant equipment, while providing protection
for the fuel, reactor systems, and containment to meet current design requirements. Thus the proposed change does
not significantly increase the consequences of accident previously analyzed.
* [Increase in main steam line (MSL) high flow differential pressure setpoint to reflect the increased operating
pressure]
The MSL high flow differential pressure setpoint is increased to reflect the higher steam flows necessary to operate
the plant at the higher power. The proposed change does not affect the design, construction, or operation of existing
plant equipment, nor does it add new equipment. The proposed change does not, therefore, affect the probability of
accidents previously analyzed. The increased setpoint does not affect the maximum closure time for the main steam
isolation valves, thus the release of fission products during postulated accident is not changed from current design
analyses. The proposed change does not, therefore, affect the consequences of accidents previously analyzed.
* [Revised temperature/pressure limit curves to reflect the higher neutron flux over vessel life]
The temperature/pressure limit curves are being modified to reflect the increased exposure to neutron flux over
the life of the vessel, to retain the existing margin to brittle fracture over vessel life. The plant will continue
to be operated in conformance to the pressure/temperature limits, retaining the existing probability of overcooling
events and associated postulated brittle fracture of the reactor vessel. If a failure were to occur, the mode of failure
is unaffected by the proposed change, thus the consequences of a postulated failure of the reactor vessel is unchanged
by the proposed amendment.
* [Increase in the pressure at which reactor core isolation cooling (RCIC) testing occurs]
The pressure at which the RCIC system is tested is being increased to ensure adequate system operation with the increased
reactor system pressure required for power uprate. No credit for RCIC system operation is taken in any accident analysis
nor is RCIC included as an accident initiator, thus this change does not affect the probability or consequences of
an accident previously evaluated.
* [Change of the reactor protection system and End-of-Cycle/ Recirculation Pump Trip (EOC/RPT) trip setpoint from
a fixed to a variable setpoint based on power level]
This setpoint is being changed from a specific value of main turbine first stage pressure to a value to be calculated
based on variable plant conditions. The basis for the setpoint will remain unchanged at a value equivalent to thermal
power less than 30% of rated thermal power. This change is proposed because turbine first stage pressure can vary for
a given thermal power level depending on the amount of subcooling in the core, which itself is highly dependent on feedwater
temperatures. This proposed change does not affect the reliability of operation of the trip circuitry, nor does it
affect the design or operation of plant equipment or safety systems. Thus the change does not affect the probability
of accidents previously evaluated. In addition, the proposed change retains the same basis for establishing the
setpoint as currently stated in the TS, thus the setpoint will be established at the level (30% rated thermal power)
assumed in the accident analysis. Thus the proposed change does not affect the consequences of any accidents previously
evaluated.
* [Increase in the safety relief valve (SRV) setpoints]
The licensee proposes to increase the setpoints of the two lowest-set SRVs to accommodate the change in maximum operating
pressure after power uprate. This increase in SRV setpoints maintains approximately the same difference between
maximum operating RPV pressure and the lowest SRV setpoint as currently exists. As discussed in the above section
regarding increased operating pressure, increasing the pressure at which the lowest SRV actuates would allow operation
at a slightly higher pressure than currently allowed. This results in the plant operating closer to the criteria used
in the design analysis. However, since operation of the plant within design limits is considered to result in a very
low probability of failure of systems or components, this small increase in maximum operating pressure is considered
to have a negligible increase in failure probability. Thus the proposed change does significantly increase the likelihood
of failure of existing systems or components, and does not affect the probability of an accident previously evaluated.
With the increased SRV setpoint, the analysis results show that the peak RPV pressure will remain below the ASME code
limit, keeping any postulated radiological consequences within the bounds of existing analyses. Thus the consequences
of an accident previously evaluated are not affected.
*[Increase the value of P

a

 (the pressure at which primary containment is tested). Add a new definition for P

a

 in the ``Definition'' section of the TS that gives a specific value of P

a

, and simplify the TS by deleting the specific value of P

a

 and 1.10
P

a

 from other locations in the TS]
The analysis to support the power uprate resulted in a higher calculated peak containment pressure in response to
postulated accidents. To maintain the validity of the radiological analysis, the containment leak rate testing
must be based on a pressure greater than or equal to the peak calculated containment pressure. The proposed change
does not affect the design, construction, or operation of existing plant systems or components, and therefore does
not affect the probability of accidents previously evaluated.
The increase in test pressure does not affect the acceptance criteria for the test, which is based on acceptable leakage.
Offsite dose projections are based in part on the leakage criteria, and since the proposed change does not affect the
leakage limits, the change does not affect the consequences of accidents previously evaluated.
The addition of a definition of P

a

, the delineation of the specific value in the definition and associated deletion of the specific value in individual
TS, is a purely administrative change that does not affect plant design, construction, or operation. This part of
the proposed change does not, therefore, affect the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.
* [Increase in the SRV setpoint tolerance]
The licensee is proposing to increase the setpoint tolerance for the SRVs from +1/-3% to plus or minus 3% of the setpoint.
This proposed change does not affect how the SRVs operate in response to accidents or abnormal operating occurrences,
and thus does not affect the probability of an accident previously evaluated.
The proposed increase in setpoint tolerance results in a potentially higher pressure at which an SRV would lift. This
increase in pressure is approximately 23 psig, based on the proposed maximum system pressure and proposed setpoint
tolerance. This 2% increase in maximum lift pressure would result in a proportional increase in possible offsite
dose due to a postulated event. The dose increase would be something less than 2%, since the increased pressure would
result in a corresponding increase in differential pressure, with attendant flow losses and subsequent filtration
through accident mitigation systems accounting for the lower dose. This small increase in postulated offsite dose
is not considered a significant increase in the consequences of accidents previously evaluated. 
* [Increase in the number of automatic depressurization system (ADS) valves that are allowed out of service]
The proposed change would allow one ADS valve to be out of service without time limit, and changing the minimum number
of ADS valves required to be in service from seven to six. The change would allow two ADS valves (compared to the current
one) to be out of service for up to 14 days, and would require plant shutdown within 12 hours for three or more ADS valves
(compared to the current two or more) out of service. The proposed change would reduce the likelihood of an inadvertent
opening ADS/SRV as an initiating event if one SRV were out of service. Having more than one ADS/SRV out of service would
also reduce this likelihood, although the reduction would have minimal effect since the probability of multiple
ADS/SRVs being out of service with a concurrent lift and failure to close of an SRV is small. Thus the proposed change
would have little effect on the probability of accidents previously evaluated.
The ADS/SRVs serve to limit overpressurization of the RPV and connected primary piping. Having ADS valves out of service
would increase the consequences compared to the current TS which limit any ADS valves out of service for more than 14
days. Reanalysis of the effect of ADS valves on protection of the RPV demonstrated that five ADS valves would prevent
RPV overpressurization as the previous analysis using six ADS valves. Thus the proposed change would not affect the
consequences of accidents previously evaluated.


2. Does the amendment create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated?

* [Increase in Rated Thermal Power from 3323 MWt to 3486 MWt]
Equipment that could be impacted by power uprate has been evaluated by the licensee. The proposed change has not introduced
any new operating modes, equipment lineups, accident scenarios, or equipment failure modes. The full spectrum of
accident considerations defined in Regulatory Guide 1.70 has been reviewed, and no new or different kind of accident
has been identified. Power uprate uses existing technology and applies it within the capabilities of existing plant
equipment in accordance with existing regulatory criteria including NRC-approved codes, standards, and methods.
General Electric has designed to higher power levels than the uprated power of WNP-2, and no new power-dependent accidents
have been identified. Therefore, the proposed change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of
accident from any accident previously evaluated.
* [Increase in the maximum allowable reactor steam dome operating pressure limit]
The proposed change does not involve the addition of new equipment, nor has it introduced any new operating modes,
equipment lineups, accident scenarios, or equipment failure modes. The proposed change does not, therefore, create
the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.
* [Increase in the average power range monitor (APRM) and flow biased scram and rod block monitor (RBM) setpoints]
The proposed setpoint changes do not involve the addition of new equipment, nor do they introduce any new operating
modes, equipment lineups, accident scenarios, or equipment failure modes. The proposed changes do not, therefore,
create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.
* [Increase in main steam line (MSL) high flow differential pressure setpoint to reflect the increased operating
pressure]
The proposed setpoint change does not involve the addition of new equipment, nor does it introduce any new operating
modes, equipment lineups, accident scenarios, or equipment failure modes. The proposed change does not, therefore,
create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.
* [Revised temperature/pressure limit curves to reflect the higher neutron flux over vessel life]
The proposed change does not involve the addition of new equipment, nor does it introduce any new operating modes,
equipment lineups, accident scenarios, or equipment failure modes. The proposed change does not, therefore, create
the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.
* [Increase in the pressure at which reactor core isolation cooling (RCIC) testing occurs]
The proposed change does not involve the addition of new equipment, nor does it introduce any new operating modes,
equipment lineups, accident scenarios, or equipment failure modes. The proposed change does not, therefore, create
the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.
* [Change of the reactor protection system and End-of-Cycle/ Recirculation Pump Trip (EOC/RPT) trip setpoint from
a fixed to a variable setpoint based on power level]
The proposed change does not involve the addition of new equipment, nor does it introduce any new operating modes,
equipment lineups, accident scenarios, or equipment failure modes. The proposed change does not, therefore, create
the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.
* [Increase in the safety relief valve (SRV) setpoints]
The proposed change does not involve the addition of new equipment, nor does it introduce any new operating modes,
equipment lineups, accident scenarios, or equipment failure modes. The proposed change does not, therefore, create
the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.
* [Increase the value of P

a

 (the pressure at which primary containment is tested). Add a new definition for P

a

 in the ``Definition'' section of the TS that gives a specific value of P

a

, and simplify the TS by deleting the specific value of P

a

 and 1.10 P

a

 from other locations in the TS]
The proposed change does not involve the addition of new equipment, nor do it introduce any new operating modes, equipment
lineups, accident scenarios, or equipment failure modes. The proposed change does not, therefore, create the possibility
of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.
* [Increase in the SRV setpoint tolerance]
The proposed change does not involve the addition of new equipment, nor does it introduce any new operating modes,
equipment lineups, accident scenarios, or equipment failure modes. The proposed change does not, therefore, create
the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.
* [Increase in the number of automatic depressurization system (ADS) valves that are allowed out of service]
The proposed change does not involve the addition of new equipment, nor does it introduce any new operating modes,
accident sequences, or equipment failure modes. The proposed change does allow a new equipment lineup by allowing
operation with one ADS valve out of service with no limitation, which is not allowed by the current TS. In addition,
two ADS valves can be out of service for an extended period of time (14 days), with shutdown within 12 hours required
only for three or more valves inoperable compared to the current two valves. This allowed equipment lineup does not
alter the operation of the ADS valves or their impact as potential event initiators as discussed in the FSAR. The proposed
change does not, therefore, create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously
evaluated.
3. Does the amendment involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety?
*[Increase in Rated Thermal Power from 3323 MWt to 3486 MWt]
The plant was originally designed for operation at 105% rated steam flow. The proposed change therefore does not affect
the fuel design or safety limits. The Maximum Axial Power Linear Heat Generation Rate (MAPLHGR) limits remain the
same. The Operating Limit Minimum Critical Power Ratio (OLMCPR) is expected to increase by approximately 2%, which
will ensure that the margin to the Safety Limit MCPR is not affected. 
The entire plant design has been reviewed to ensure that plant equipment will perform properly and will still meet
original design and licensing criteria. The safety margins prescribed by the 

Code of Federal Regulations 

have been maintained by meeting the appropriate regulatory criteria. The margins provided by the application of
the ASME design acceptance criteria have been maintained, as well as other margin-assuring acceptance criteria.
The emergency core cooling system-loss of coolant accident analysis was conservatively performed based on two ADS
valves out of service and power level corresponding to 110% of original rated steam flow (plus 2% power uncertainty
factor). The analyzed results remain well below the safety margin established at the 2200
&cir;F peak centerline temperature regulatory limit.
The overpressurization and containment analyses were repeated based on 110% of original rated steam flow, resulting
in a slightly higher peak reactor vessel pressure. The increased pressure remains below the acceptance criteria
for the design basis, which the licensee identified as below the ASME code limit and below the applicable TS limit.
From the containment analysis, the peak containment pressure increases from 34.7 psig to 35.1 psig. This remains
below the containment design pressure of 45 psig.
The postulated radiological doses of design basis events, including the bounding analysis involving loss of coolant
accident, were calculated based on the uprate power level. The results remain within the design basis established
by 10 CFR Part 100.
Based on these considerations, the proposed increase in licensed power level does not significantly reduce any margins
of safety.
* [Increase in the maximum allowable reactor steam dome operating pressure limit]
The maximum pressure is increased by the same amount as the nominal operating pressure increase for power uprate.
The increased pressure remains below the acceptance criteria for the design basis, which the licensee identified
as below the ASME code limit and below the applicable TS limit. Thus the proposed TS change does not reduce the margin
to safety.
* [Increase in the average power range monitor (APRM) flow biased scram and rod block monitor (RBM) setpoints]
The APRM flow biased scram setpoints were increase by the same percentage of power as the uprated power. This maintains
the same margin to the trip setpoint while maintaining the same scram avoidance as originally designed. The current
margin (9%) between the scram line and rod block line is maintained for power uprate. Thus the proposed TS changes do
not reduce any margin to safety.
* [Increase in main steam line (MSL) high flow isolation differential pressure setpoint to reflect the increased
operating pressure]
The revised safety analysis retains the current analytic basis of 140% of rated steam flow to ensure the same level
of scram avoidance is maintained. This results in approximately a 10% increase in the differential pressure required
to trip the plant. This change does not, however, affect the assumed closure times for the main steam isolation valves
in design analyses. The closure times determine the analyzed release of fission products during postulated accidents.
Since the closure time is unaffected by the proposed change, the change does not affect the margin of safety.
* [Revised temperature/pressure limit curves to reflect the higher neutron flux over vessel life]
The proposed increase in licensed power also increases the neutron fluence on the reactor pressure vessel over the
license period (40 years). The analysis for the pressure/temperature limit curves was updated to incorporate the
increased fluence, and the revised curves maintain the same margin to postulated brittle fracture of the reactor
vessel as the current TS curves. The proposed change does not, therefore, change a margin of safety.
* [Increase in the pressure at which reactor core isolation cooling (RCIC) testing occurs]
The proposed change would increase the test pressure for RCIC to conform to the increased system pressure resulting
from the power uprate. Increasing the test pressure periodically verifies that RCIC will operate at the increased
pressure resulting from power uprate. In addition, RCIC is not credited in safety analyses for assuring that margins
of safety are maintained. The proposed change, therefore, does not affect any margin of safety.
* [Change of the reactor protection system and End-of-Cycle/ Recirculation Pump Trip (EOC/RPT) trip setpoint from
a fixed to a variable setpoint based on power level]
The safety analyses assume an EOC/RPT at 30% power. This proposed change will allow the setpoint to vary relative to
turbine first stage pressure (the current TS setpoint), but will assure that the setpoint is set based on a fixed 30%
power. This assures that the EOC/RPT maintains the existing margin of safety.
* [Increase in the safety relief valve (SRV) setpoints]
The two low set SRV setpoints are being increased by the same amount of operating system pressure increase resulting
from the power uprate. The SRVs at the new setpoints will relieve pressure to ensure the reactor coolant system remains
below the acceptance criteria for the design basis, which the licensee identified as below the ASME code limit and
below the applicable TS limit. Thus the proposed TS change does not reduce the margin to safety.
* [Increase the value of P

a

 (the pressure at which primary containment is tested). Add a new definition for P

a

 in the ``Definition'' section of the TS that gives a specific value of P

a

, and simplify the TS by deleting the specific value of P

a

 and 1.10
P

a

 from other locations in the TS]
The pressure at which primary containment is to be tested is being increased to reflect the analyzed results of the
power uprate. The increase will assure that the periodic verification of containment integrity is performed at a
pressure that assures that postulated radioactive release rates remain within analyzed assumptions. This assures
that existing margins of safety are maintained.
* [Increase in the SRV setpoint tolerance]
The proposed increase in the SRV setpoint tolerance from +1/-3% to plus or minus 3% of the setpoint has the potential
to increase the actual pressure at which the SRV would lift. This increase in pressure is approximately 23 psig, or
2% of the design lift pressure. This pressure is still well within the RPV design pressure that establishes the safety
margin. The proposed change would not, therefore, affect a margin of safety.
* [Increase in the number of automatic depressurization system (ADS) valves that are allowed out of service]
The proposed change results in an increase in the calculated peak centerline temperature (PCT) for postulated accidents,
specifically, the loss of coolant accident (LOCA). The margin of safety for this parameter at WNP-2 is 2200
&cir;F, which is also the regulatory limit. Maintaining PCT less than 2200
&cir;F ensures cladding integrity, including the safety margin established by regulation. The proposed change
does not, therefore, affect a margin of safety.
Based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes
to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration.


Local Public Document Room location: 

Richland Public Library, 955 Northgate Street, Richland, Washington 99352


Attorney for licensee: 

M. H. Philips, Jr., Esq., Winston  Strawn, 1400 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20005-3502


NRC Project Director: 

Theodore R. Quay



Washington Public Power Supply System, Docket No. 50-397, Nuclear Project No. 2, Benton County, Washington 




Date of amendment request: 

October 31, 1994


Description of amendment request: 

The proposed amendment would modify the Technical Specifications (TS) to: (1) add two action statements that would
provide allowed outage times for either one or both of the scram discharge volume (SDV) vent or drain valves less stringent
that the current requirements of TS 3.0.3.; and (2) change the surveillance requirements for the SDV vent and drain
valves to conduct the testing during shutdown conditions rather than at power as currently required.


Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration,
which is presented below: 


1. Does the change involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated?

 [Adding action statements for allowed outage times]

The primary functions of the SDV vent and drain valves are to isolate the SDV following a scram to stop leakage of reactor
coolant past the CRD seals and to reopen following a scram to reset to drain the reactor coolant from the SDV to the reactor
building equipment drain sump. The SDV is sized to accept CRD over piston discharge water from all 185 CRDs. The SDV
vent and drain valves reopen when the scram signal is reset to provide assurance that there is sufficient SDV volume
available to accept the CRD discharge in the event of another scram. Each vent and drain line contains two redundant
valves in series, which close to isolate the SDV on a scram signal.

Proposed Action Statement 3.1.3.1.d allows 7 days to repair an inoperable valve when the redundant valve is still
operable, or isolate the affected line. The reliability of the isolation function is reduced during the period of
the 7 day Allowed Outage Time (AOT) since a single failure could prevent a redundant valve from isolating a SDV vent
or drain line. As a result, the proposed 7 day AOT introduces an increase in the risk of an unisolated path for reactor
coolant release to the reactor building floor drain or equipment drain sump. However, the reduction in reliability
can only affect plant safety if the redundant valve should fail to close during an accident involving core damage.
The probability of two valves in series failing to isolate the SDV upon demand is about 4.9 x 10

-5

. The redundant valve is designed to automatically close in response to a scram signal or upon loss of air or electrical
power. The probability of having one valve fail a surveillance test, combined with a subsequent scram and redundant
valve failure during the 7 day AOT following the surveillance is about 8.2 x 10

-7

 per year. The risk of failure to isolate the SDV is increased by about 2% (as determined by the WNP-2 Individual Plant
Evaluation (IPE)) by proposed Action Statement 3.1.3.1.d, which is not considered significant.

A failure of the SDV to isolate during a scram generally does not pose a hazard because the reactor coolant from CRD discharge
and seal leakage is routed to the reactor building drain sumps. The release of reactor coolant can be terminated by
resetting the scram from the control room, which would close the scram outlet valves, or by manually closing the isolation
valves located in the reactor building. Failure of the SDV to isolate can pose a risk of higher consequences if a core
damage accident occurs simultaneously. The increased risk of activity release during a core damage accident due
to addition of the 7 day AOT is less than 1 x 10

-9

 per year.

Proposed Action Statement 3.1.3.1.e allows 8 hours for repair when both valves in a line are inoperable. If a scram
should occur during this 8 hour period, both valves in a SDV vent or drain line could fail to isolate the line, creating
a path for reactor coolant release to the reactor building floor drain or equipment drain sump. The probability of
having to enter the proposed action statement is low, at about 4.9 x 10

-5

 per year. The probability of entering the action statement, combined with a scram occurring in the following 8 hours
is about 2.6 x 10

-7

 per year. This represents less than a 1% increase in the probability of SDV isolation failure upon demand during normal
operation, which is not considered significant.

As stated above, a failure of the SDV to isolate during a scram generally does not pose a hazard. The reactor coolant
from CRD discharge and seal leakage is routed to the reactor building equipment drain sump. The release of reactor
coolant can be terminated by resetting the scram from the control room or by manually closing the isolation valves
located in the reactor building. Failure of the SDV to isolate can pose a risk of higher consequences if a core damage
accident occurs simultaneously. The increased risk of radioactivity release during a core damage accident due to
addition of the 8 hour AOT is less than 1 x 10

-9

 per year. To date, there have not been any instances at WNP-2 where both valves in a SDV vent or drain line were inoperable
at the same time during plant operation. If this unlikely event were to occur, the proposed action statement would
require the affected line to be isolated within 8 hours. With a SDV vent or drain line isolated, normal operational
leakage from the scram outlet valves would cause the SDV instrument volume level to increase. However, ample time
would exist after receipt of a SDV high level alarm in the control room to drain the SDV instrument volume to prevent
actuation of an automatic scram on high SDV level.

Since it is unlikely that both valves in an SDV vent or drain line would be inoperable and isolated, the periodic opening
of an isolated line under administrative control for SDV instrument volume venting and draining in accordance with
proposed Note ## is expected to be very infrequent. In addition, Proposed Note # does not adversely affect plant safety
by permitting separate action statement entry for each vent and drain line since the probability of entering the proposed
action statements is low.

Based on the information presented above, it is concluded that the AOTs proposed in Action Statements 3.1.3.1.d and
3.1.3.1.e and the associated Notes do not represent changes that involve a significant increase in the probability
of an accident previously evaluated.

As discussed above, the proposed AOTs and the associated Notes introduce a small increase in the risk of an unisolated
path for reactor coolant release to the reactor building floor drain or equipment drain sump through an unisolated
SDV vent or drain line. However, this event is bounded by the *NUREG-0803 evaluation of the consequences of a postulated
reactor scram and SDV rupture. Based on the NUREG safety evaluation, the volume of coolant lost via the bounding leakage
pathway is relatively small (approximately 550 gpm or the equivalent of a 1.008 inch break), and adequate core cooling
would be maintained such that no fuel failures are predicted for the event. The NRC staff concluded in the NUREG safety
evaluation that resulting reactor building flooding for this event did not adversely impact safety-related equipment.
The NRC staff also concluded that the area of the reactor building where the leak occurs will become contaminated only
to the activity level normally present in the reactor coolant, and offsite doses would be well within the 10 CFR Part
100 reference values for plants operating with Standard Technical Specification (STS) coolant activity limits
(0.2 microCuries/gm). The release of reactor coolant through an unisolated SDV vent or drain line can be terminated
by resetting the scram from the control room, which would close the scram outlet valves, or by manually closing the
isolation valves located in the reactor building. The NUREG-0803 evaluation determined that the reactor building
would be accessible to terminate leakage during a postulated reactor scram and SDV rupture with appropriate radiological
precautions. In addition, the SDV vent and drain lines route the release in a controlled manner to the reactor building
floor drain and equipment drain sumps. Thus, the consequences are significantly less than those of the SDV rupture
analysis.

The WNP-2 FSAR Accident Analyses, Section 15.6, ``Decrease in Reactor Coolant Inventory,'' acceptance limits for
radiological consequences are based on the guidance set forth in 10 CFR Part 100. Since WNP-2 operates in accordance
with the STS coolant activity limits and the offsite dose reference values of 10 CFR Part 100, the consequences established
in the NUREG-0803 safety evaluation bound the consequences of an unisolated SDV vent or drain line event. Therefore,
the AOTs proposed in Action Statements 3.1.3.1.d and 3.1.3.1.e and the associated Notes do not represent changes
that involve a significant increase in the consequences of an accident previously evaluated.

 [Changing surveillance requirements]

The primary functions of the SDV vent and drain valves are to isolate the SDV following a scram to stop leakage of reactor
coolant past the CRD seals and to reopen following a scram reset to drain the reactor coolant from the SDV to the reactor
building equipment drain sump. The basis for Surveillance Requirement 4.1.3.1.4.a is to verify SDV vent and drain
valve operability so that the SDV will be available when needed to accept CRD over piston discharge water and so that
the reactor coolant collected in the SDV will be isolated from the secondary containment (reactor building). Performance
of Surveillance Requirement 4.1.3.1.4.a, with the proposed deletion of the control rod configuration and density
requirements and associated Note *, will still ensure that the safety functions and operability requirements are
met.

Valve operability can be demonstrated from shutdown conditions even though the surveillance test conditions of
nearly ambient temperature and pressure and reduced CRD discharge flow do not match power conditions. Maximum SDV
back pressure and CRD discharge flow will not significantly affect the SDV vent and drain valves closure rates. As
verified by testing at LaSalle County Station and WNP-2, there is only approximately a 1 second difference in SDV vent
and drain valve closing time from a scram at less than or equal to 50% rod density versus the closure time from either
the test pushbuttons or a cold shutdown scram with all rods full in. These test results show that the differences in
temperatures, pressures, and CRD discharge flows between power and cold shutdown conditions have a negligible effect
on SDV vent and drain valves closing times. [In addition, the valves will be tested in the open direction at cold shutdown
conditions during the same test conducted for valve closure.] Although the ability of the valves to open against full
reactor pressure cannot be demonstrated during shutdown conditions, [additional verification of the valves' ability
to open will be] verified [sic] as part of the scram recovery procedure. Thus, the ability of the valves to open against
full reactor pressure will still be demonstrated after each reactor scram during operation.

Since the operability of the SDV vent and drain valves can be demonstrated by performing Surveillance Requirement
4.1.3.1.4.a during shutdown conditions, the change does not represent a significant increase in the probability
or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.

2. Does the change create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated?

 [Adding action statements for allowed outage times]

The AOTs proposed in Action Statements 3.1.3.1.d and 3.1.3.1.e and the associated Notes do not involve any changes
to the facility or operation of the facility as described in the WNP-2 FSAR. The isolation function of the SDV vent and
drain valves to prevent the discharge of reactor coolant into the reactor building floor drain and equipment drain
sumps following a scram is maintained. The release of reactor coolant through a SDV vent or drain line during a scram
can be isolated either by automatic closure of the redundant valve in response to the scram signal or by manual isolation
of the affected line. The valves will also close automatically upon loss of air to the valves or electrical power to
the associated solenoid pilot valves. The alarm, control rod withdrawal block, and reactor scram functions on increasing
water level in the SDV instrument volume are unaffected by the proposed amendments. Although the proposed AOTs will
change the method of plant operation, potentially resulting in a reduction in SDV vent or drain line isolation reliability,
the potential release to the reactor building drain sumps has been previously evaluated in NUREG-0803, and as shown
in (1) above, the associated probabilities of the event are acceptably low.

Since the AOTs proposed in Action Statements 3.1.3.1.d and 3.1.3.1.e and the associated Notes do not involve a change
to the facility or the method of operation that has not been previously evaluated, the change does not create the possibility
of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.

 [Changing surveillance requirements]

The deletion of the control rod configuration and density requirements and associated Note * proposed for Surveillance
Requirement 4.1.3.1.4.a only change the conditions under which the surveillance is performed. As such, the change
does not involve a change to the facility or method of operation as describe in the WNP-2 FSAR. As discussed in (1) above,
performance of the surveillance with the proposed changes will still demonstrate SDV vent and drain valve operability
to ensure that the SDV will perform as evaluated in the FSAR accident analysis.

Since the performance of Surveillance Requirement 4.1.3.1.4.a during shutdown conditions does not involve a change
to the facility or the method of operation, the change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident
from any accident previously evaluated.

Does the change involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety?

 [Adding action statements for allowed outage times]

As discussed in (1) above, the AOTs proposed in Action Statements 3.1.3.1.d and 3.1.3.1.e and the associated Notes
introduce a small increase in the risk of an unisolated path for reactor coolant release to the reactor building floor
drain and equipment drain sumps through an unisolated SDV vent or drain line. The increased risk is due to the reduction
in isolation function reliability when SDV vent and drain valves are inoperable. Since this reduction in reliability
can only affect plant safety during a scram, it is expected that the increased risk of release due to a scram attributed
to the AOTs will be offset by the reduced risk of a scram that will result from a reduction in the number of manual plant
shutdowns. Currently, if one or more of the SDV vent or drain valves is discovered to be inoperable, an immediate plant
shutdown is required. Establishment of the AOTs will eliminate these unnecessary plant shutdowns that limit plant
operational flexibility and increase the risk of a plant scram and challenges to safety systems. Moreover, there
is only a small probability of a scram occurring during the AOTs coincident with the failure of a SDV vent or drain line
to isolate. The release of reactor coolant to the reactor building floor drain and equipment drain sumps through an
unisolated line can be terminated by resetting the scram from the control room or by manually closing the isolation
valves. Furthermore, the consequences of such an event are bounded by the consequences of the postulated reactor
scram and SDV rupture event evaluated in NUREG-0803 and would be well within the 10 CFR Part 100 reference values.

Since the AOTs proposed in Action Statement 3.1.3.1.d and 3.1.3.1.e and the associated Notes do not change the assumptions
or increase the consequences of the bounding NUREG-0803 accident analysis, the margin to the 10 CFR Part 100 reference
values is not changed. Therefore, the change does not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety.

 [Changing surveillance requirements]

Performance of Surveillance Requirement 4.1.3.1.4.a with the proposed deletion of the control rod configuration
and density requirements and associated Note * will still ensure that the SDV vent and drain valve safety functions
and operability requirements are met. Valve operability can be demonstrated from shutdown conditions even though
the surveillance test conditions of nearly ambient temperature and pressure at shutdown and reduced CRD discharge
flow do not match power conditions. As discussed in (1) above, the difference in test conditions represents only approximately
a 1 second difference in the 30 second (as specified in Surveillance Requirement 4.1.3.1.4.a.1) SDV vent and drain
valve closing times.
 
The potential reduction in safety margin is related to the reliability of the SDV vent and drain valves to close within
the required time to contain the reactor coolant leakage past the CRD seals following a scram. The consequences of
the valves failing to close to isolate a line are bounded by the postulated reactor scram and SDV rupture event evaluated
in NUREG-0803, which assumes a constant leakage rate for 4 hours. Since the NUREG evaluation concluded that the consequences
of such an event would be well within the 10 CFR Part 100 reference values, the potential one second difference in valve
closing time is relatively insignificant. In addition, the proposed surveillance requirement would eliminate
approximately 20 scrams at power over the remaining life of the plant and prevent the concomitant transients and challenges
to safety systems. This would be expected to increase the reliability of the SDV vent and drain valves and mitigate
any reduction in safety margin. Although performance of the proposed surveillance requirement during shutdown
conditions will not demonstrate the ability of the valves to open against a back pressure equal to full reactor pressure,
the valves are verified to be open as part of [the test conducted at shutdown conditions as well] the scram recovery
procedure. Thus, the ability of the valves to open against full reactor pressure will still be demonstrated after
each reactor scram during operation.

Since the performance of Surveillance Requirement 4.1.3.1.4.a during shutdown conditions does not change the assumptions
or increase the consequences of the bounding NUREG-0803 accident analysis, the margin to the 10 CFR Part 100 reference
values is not changed. Therefore, the change does not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety.



The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of
50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant
hazards consideration.


Local Public Document Room location: 

Richland Public Library, 955 Northgate Street, Richland, Washington 99352


Attorney for licensee: 

M. H. Philips, Jr., Esq., Winston  Strawn, 1400 L Street, N.W., Washington, D.C. 20005-3502
















NRC Project Director: 

Theodore R. Quay



Washington Public Power Supply System, Docket No. 50-397, Nuclear Project 
No. 2, Benton County, Washington 
Date of application for amendment: October 31, 1994 




Brief description of amendment: 

The proposed amendment would revise the technical specifications to remove the requirements related to operability
and surveillance testing of the safety/relief valve (SRV) position indication instrumentation. 

Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: 

As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration.
The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis against the standards of 50.92(c). The NRC staff's review is presented
below.

1. Does the proposed amendment involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously
evaluated?
The proposed change would relocate the SRV position indication instrumentation TS requirements to other licensee-controlled
documents. This is an administrative change which does not involve any modification to plant equipment or plant operation
as described in the WNP-2 Final Safety Analysis Report (FSAR). The instrumentation would continue to be available
to provide SRV position indication to the operators. Therefore, the proposed amendment does not involve an increase
in the probability or consequences of a previously evaluated accident.
2. Does the proposed amendment create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously
evaluated?
The proposed change does not involve any physical alteration to plant equipment and results in no changes in the performance
of any safety-related system. Therefore, the proposed amendment does not create the possibility of a new or different
kind of accident from any previously evaluated accident.
3. Does the proposed amendment involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety?
As noted above, the proposed change does not involve any modification to plant equipment or plant operation. The proposed
change does not affect any accident analyses contained in the WNP-2 FSAR. Therefore, the proposed amendment does
not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety.
Based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff
proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration.


Local Public Document Room location: 

Richland Public Library, 955 Northgate Street, Richland, Washington 99352


Attorney for licensee: 

M. H. Philips, Jr., Esq., Winston  Strawn, 1400 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20005-3502


NRC Project Director: 

Theodore R. Quay




Notice Of Issuance Of Amendments To Facility Operating Licenses



During the period since publication of the last biweekly notice, the Commission has issued the following amendments.
The Commission has determined for each of these amendments that the application complies with the standards and requirements
of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the Act), and the Commission's rules and regulations. The Commission
has made appropriate findings as required by the Act and the Commission's rules and regulations in 10 CFR Chapter I,
which are set forth in the license amendment. 
Notice of Consideration of Issuance of Amendment to Facility Operating License, Proposed No Significant Hazards
Consideration Determination, and Opportunity for A Hearing in connection with these actions was published in the


Federal Register 

as indicated.
Unless otherwise indicated, the Commission has determined that these amendments satisfy the criteria for categorical
exclusion in accordance with 10 CFR 51.22. Therefore, pursuant to 10 CFR 51.22(b), no environmental impact statement
or environmental assessment need be prepared for these amendments. If the Commission has prepared an environmental
assessment under the special circumstances provision in 10 CFR 51.12(b) and has made a determination based on that
assessment, it is so indicated.

For further details with respect to the action see (1) the applications for amendment, (2) the amendment, and (3) the
Commission's related letter, Safety Evaluation and/or Environmental Assessment as indicated. All of these items
are available for public inspection at the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street,
NW., Washington, DC, and at the local public document rooms for the particular facilities involved. 






Baltimore Gas and Electric Company, Docket Nos. 50-317 and 50-318, Calvert Cliffs Nuclear Power Plant, Unit Nos.
1 and 2, Calvert County, Maryland







Date of application for amendments: 

 August 2, 1994 














Brief description of amendments: 

The amendments revise Technical Specifications 3.9.1 and 3.1.2.7 to clarify the requirements when the required
boron concentration is greater than 2300 ppm. 



Date of issuance: 

November 29, 1994



Effective date: 

As of the date of issuance to be implemented within 30 days.







Amendment Nos.: 

 Unit 1 - #201 - Unit 2 - #179










Facility Operating License Nos. 

DPR-53 and DPR-69: Amendments revised the Technical Specifications.


Date of initial notice in 

Federal Register: 

September 14, 1994  (59 FR 47164). The Commission's related evaluation of these amendments is contained in a Safety
Evaluation dated November 29, 1994. 
No significant hazards consideration comments received: No 










Local Public Document Room location: 

Calvert County Library, Prince Frederick, Maryland 20678. 







Carolina Power  Light Company, et al., Docket No. 50-400, Shearon Harris Nuclear Power Plant, Unit 1, Wake and
Chatham Counties, North Carolina









Date of application for amendment: 

August 25, 1994 












Brief description of amendment: 

The amendment will revise the Total Allowance, Z, S and Allowable Values for the steam generator (SG) level instrument
calculations. However, the trip setpoints relating to SG level will not be changed.






Date of issuance: 

December 9, 1994






Effective date: 

December 9, 1994

Amendment No. 

52






Facility Operating License No. 

NPF-63. Amendment revises the Technical Specifications






Date of initial notice in 

Federal Register: 

September 28, 1994 (59 FR 49425). The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation
dated December 9, 1994. 
No significant hazards consideration comments received: No






Local Public Document Room location: 

Cameron Village Regional Library, 1930 Clark Avenue, Raleigh, North Carolina 27605.














Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-295 and 50-304, Zion Nuclear Power Station Units 1 and 2, Lake County,
Illinois




Date of application for amendments: 

September 19, 1994


Brief description of amendments: 

The amendments revise the Technical Specifications by reducing the frequency for testing the containment spray
system spray nozzles.


Date of issuance: 

November 28, 1994


Effective date: 

November 28, 1994


Amendment Nos.: 

159 and 147


Facility Operating License Nos. 

DPR-39 and DPR-48. The amendments revised the Technical Specifications.


Date of initial notice in 

Federal Register: 

October 12, 1994 (59 FR 51618). The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation
dated November 28, 1994. 
No significant hazards consideration comments received: No 


Local Public Document Room location: 

Waukegan Public Library, 128 N. County Street, Waukegan, Illinois 60085. 


Duke Power Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-413 and 50-414, Catawba Nuclear Station, Units 1 and 2, York County, South
Carolina




Date of application for amendments: 

August 25, 1994


Brief description of amendments: 

The amendments revise the testing interval for auxiliary feedwater (AFW) system pumps from monthly to quarterly
on a staggered test basis. The amendments are consistent with the guidance in NUREG-1366, ``Improvements to Technical
Specifications Surveillance Requirements'' and Generic Letter 93-05, ``Line-Item Technical Specifications
Improvements to Reduce Surveillance Requirements for Testing During Power Operation.'' In addition, a note is incorporated
from 
NUREG-1431, ``Revised Standard Technical Specifications, Westinghouse Plants'' into the TS clarifying that the
turbine-driven AFW pump cannot be tested until the required pressure exists in the secondary side of the steam generator.



Date of issuance: 

December 8, 1994


Effective date: 

To be implemented within 30 days from the date of issuance.


Amendment Nos.: 

126 and 120


Facility Operating License Nos. 

NPF-35 and NPF-52: Amendments revised the Technical Specifications. 


Date of initial notice in 

Federal Register: 

59 FR 51619 dated October 12, 1994. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety
Evaluation dated December 8, 1994. 
No significant hazards consideration comments received: No


Local Public Document Room location: 

York County Library, 138 East Black Street, Rock Hill, South Carolina 29730



GPU Nuclear Corporation, et al., Docket No. 50-219, Oyster Creek Nuclear Generating Station, Ocean County, New Jersey




Date of application for amendment: 

September 26, 1994 


Brief description of amendment: 

The amendment revises the license condition regarding the ``Plan for the Long Range Planning Program.'' The amendment
revises the Plan by changing the semi-annual reporting period to annual, and to reflect refined evaluation criteria
and assessment methodology, and to incorporate necessary changes to the license condition wording.


Date of issuance: 

November 28, 1994


Effective date: 

 As of the date of issuance. 


Amendment No.: 

173


Facility Operating License No. 

DPR-16. Amendment revised the license.


Date of initial notice in 

Federal Register: 

October 26, 1994 (59 FR 53840). The Commission's related evaluation of this amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation
dated November 28, 1994. 
No significant hazards consideration comments received: No.


Local Public Document Room location: 

Ocean County Library, Reference Department, 101 Washington Street, Toms River, NJ 08753.




GPU Nuclear Corporation, et al., Docket No. 50-289, Three Mile Island Nuclear Station, Unit No. 1, Dauphin County,
Pennsylvania




Date of application for amendment: 

September 26, 1994


Brief description of amendment: 

The amendment revises the plant operating license for Three Mile Island, Unit 1 (TMI-1) by changing the license condition
regarding the ``Plan for the Long Range Planning Program.'' The amendment revises the Plan by changing the semi-annual
reporting frequency to annual, reflects refined evaluation criteria and assessment methodology, and incorporates
necessary changes to the license condition wording.


Date of issuance: 

November 28, 1994


Effective date: 

As of its date of issuance.


Amendment No.: 

192


Facility Operating License No. 

DPR-50. Amendment revised License Condition No. 2.C.9.


Date of initial notice in 

Federal Register: 

October 26, 1994 (59 FR 53841) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation
dated November 28, 1994. 
No significant hazards consideration comments received: No.


Local Public Document Room location: 

 Government Publications Section, State Library of Pennsylvania, Walnut Street and Commonwealth Avenue, Box 1601,
Harrisburg, PA 17105.



Indiana Michigan Power Company, Docket No. 50-316, Donald C. Cook, Nuclear Plant, Unit No. 2, Berrien County, Michigan




Date of application for amendment: 

February 22, 1994


Brief description of amendment: 

The amendment revises the Technical Specifications (TS) for pressure vessel heatup and cooldown curves and extends
the applicability from 12 effective full power years (EFPYs) of operation to 15 EFPYs. The TS changes are based on an
analysis of the Cook Unit 2 surveillance capsule U which was removed after exposure of 8.65 EFPYs.


Date of issuance: 

 November 25, 1994


Effective date: 

November 25, 1994


Amendment No.: 

171


Facility Operating License No. 

DPR-74. Amendment revises the Technical Specifications.


Date of initial notice in 

Federal Register: 

March 30, 1994 (59 FR 14891) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation
dated November 25, 1994.
No significant hazards consideration comments received: No.


Local Public Document Room location: 

Maud Preston Palenske Memorial Library, 500 Market Street, St. Joseph, Michigan 49085.



Niagara Mohawk Power Corporation, Docket No. 50-410, Nine Mile Point 
Nuclear Station, Unit 2, Oswego County, New York 




Date of application for amendment: 

August 26, 1994


Brief description of amendment: 

The amendment revises the Action statements for TS 3.6.1.3, ``Primary Containment Air Locks,'' to allow continued
plant operation if the containment air lock interlock mechanism becomes inoperable, provided an operable door of
the air lock is locked shut and is verified locked shut at least once per 31 days.


Date of issuance: 

November 29, 1994


Effective date: 

As of the date of issuance to be implemented within 30 days.


Amendment No.: 

59


Facility Operating License No. 

NPF-69: Amendment revises the Technical Specifications.


Date of initial notice in 

Federal Register: 

September 28, 1994 (59 FR 49431) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation
dated November 29, 1994. 
No significant hazards consideration comments received: No 


Local Public Document Room location: 

Reference and Documents Department, Penfield Library, State University of New York, Oswego, New York 13126.



Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, Docket No. 50-245, Millstone 
Nuclear Power Station, Unit 1, New London County, Connecticut




Date of application for amendment: 

 September 9, 1994 


Brief description of amendment: 

The amendment to the Technical Specifications deletes the requirement for a special test of the alternate train when
one train is inoperable.


Date of issuance: 

November 28, 1994


Effective date: 

As of the date of issuance to be implemented within 60 days. 


Amendment No.: 

76


Facility Operating License No. 

DPR-21. Amendment revised the Technical Specifications. 


Date of initial notice in 

Federal Register: 

October 26, 1994 (59 FR 53842) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation
dated November 28, 1994. 
No significant hazards consideration comments received: No.


Local Public Document Room location: 

Learning Resource Center, Three Rivers Community-Technical College, Thames Valley Campus, 574 New London Turnpike,
Norwich, CT 06360.



Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al., Docket No. 50-423, Millstone 
Nuclear Power Station, Unit No. 3, New London County, Connecticut




Date of application for amendment: 

June 30, 1994 


Brief description of amendment: 

The amendment revises the Technical Specifications (TS) to change the trip setpoint for the 4kV bus undervoltage
relay (for the grid degraded voltage) from its current value of greater than or equal to 3710 volts to its new setting
of greater than or equal to 3730 volts.


Date of issuance: 

November 30, 1994


Effective date: 

As of the date of issuance to be implemented within 30 days. 


Amendment No.: 

98


Facility Operating License No. 

NPF-49. Amendment revised the Technical Specifications. 


Date of initial notice in 

Federal Register: 

August 3, 1994 (59 FR 39594) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation
dated November 30, 1994. 
No significant hazards consideration comments received: No.


Local Public Document Room location: 

Learning Resources Center, Three Rivers Community-Technical College, Thames Valley Campus, 574 New London Turnpike,
Norwich, CT 06360.



Philadelphia Electric Company, Docket Nos. 50-352 and 50-353, Limerick 
Generating Station, Units 1 and 2, Montgomery County, Pennsylvania




Date of application for amendments: 

January 14, 1994, as supplemented by letters dated March 22, July 14, September 1, October 21, and November 22, 1994


Brief description of amendments: 

The amendments revise TS sections 5.5.1.1 and 5.5.3, to permit a modification to install new high density spent fuel
storage racks in each of the spent fuel pools at Limerick. The new high density spent fuel storage racks will increase
the spent fuel pool storage capacity in each spent fuel pool to 4117 fuel assemblies.


Date of issuance: 

 November 29, 1994


Effective date: 

November 29, 1994


Amendment Nos. 

82 and 43


Facility Operating License Nos. 

NPF-39 and NPF-85. The amendments revised the Technical Specifications.


Date of initial notice in 

Federal Register: 

August 8, 1994 (59 FR 40376) The supplemental letters provided clarifying information that did not change the initial
no significant hazards consideration determination.
The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated November 29, 1994.

No significant hazards consideration comments received: No


Local Public Document Room location: 

Pottstown Public Library, 500 High Street, Pottstown, Pennsylvania 19464.



Philadelphia Electric Company, Public Service Electric and Gas Company 
Delmarva Power and Light Company, and Atlantic City Electric Company, 
Docket Nos. 50-277 and 50-278, Peach Bottom Atomic Power Station, 
Unit Nos. 2 and 3, York County, Pennsylvania 




Date of application for amendments: 

April 15, 1994


Brief description of amendments: 

These amendments 1) correct a typographical error in the Unit 3 TS, 2) reflect the name change of Philadelphia Electric
Company to PECO Energy Company, and 3) implement line-item TS improvements recommended by Generic Letter 93-05,
``Line-Item Technical Specifications Improvements to Reduce Surveillance Requirements for Testing During Power
Operation.'' 


Date of issuance: 

November 29, 1994


Effective date: 

November 29, 1994


Amendments Nos.: 

199 and 201


Facility Operating License Nos. 

DPR-44 and DPR-56: Amendments revised the Facility Operating License, Technical Specifications (TS), and Environmental
TS.


Date of initial notice in 

Federal Register: 

May 25, 1994 (59 FR 27064) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation
dated November 29, 1994. 
No significant hazards consideration comments received: No


Local Public Document Room location: 

Government Publications Section, State Library of Pennsylvania, (REGIONAL DEPOSITORY) Education Building, Walnut
Street and Commonwealth Avenue, Box 1601, Harrisburg, Pennsylvania 17105.



South Carolina Electric  Gas Company, South Carolina Public Service 
Authority, Docket No. 50-395, Virgil C. Summer Nuclear Station, Unit No. 1, Fairfield County, South Carolina




Date of application for amendment: 

July 20, 1994, as supplemented September 20, 1994


Brief description of amendment: 

The amendment changes the TS to to allow alternative, equivalent testing of diesel fuel used in the emergency diesel
generators (EDG). These alternative methods are necessary due to recent changes in Environmental Protection Agency
(EPA) Regulations that are designed to limit the use of high sulfur fuels.
The licensee also proposes to modify the TS by changing the revision level of WCAP-10216-P-A, ``Relaxation of Constant
Axial Offset Control - FQ Surveillance Technical Specification,'' referenced in TS 6.9.1.11. This pertains to the
FQ(z) TS (TS 3.2.1 and 3.2.2) and is necessary since Westinghouse revised their methodology in determining FQ(z).


Date of issuance: 

November 29, 1994


Effective date: 

November 29, 1994


Amendment No.: 

121


Facility Operating License No. 

NPF-12. Amendment revises the Technical Specifications.


Date of initial notice in 

Federal Register: 

October 12, 1994 (59 FR 51626) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation
dated November 29, 1994. 
No significant hazards consideration comments received: No


Local Public Document Room location: 

Fairfield County Library, 300 Washington Street, Winnsboro, SC 29180



Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-259, 50-260, and 50-296, Browns Ferry Nuclear Plant, Units 1, 2, and 3,
Limestone County, Alabama




Date of application for amendments: 

March 18, 1993 (TS 331)


Brief description of amendments: 

The proposed changes consist of administrative changes to the Technical Specifications for the Browns Ferry Nuclear
Plant (BFN), Units 1, 2, and 3. The changes include deletion of requirements applicable only to BFN Unit 2 Cycle 6 operation,
various administrative error corrections, eliminating discrepancies between the Technical Specification Bases
and the BFN Final Safety Analysis Report, and clarification of certain requirements to ensure consistency in application.


Date of issuance: 

December 7, 1994


Effective date: 

December 7, 1994


Amendment Nos.: 

213, 229 and 186


Facility Operating License Nos. 

DPR-33, DPR-52 and DPR-68: Amendments revised the Technical Specifications.


Date of initial notice in 

Federal Register: 

April 1, 1993 (58 FR 17296) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation
dated December 7, 1994. 
No significant hazards consideration comments received: None


Local Public Document Room location: 

Athens Public Library, South Street, Athens, Alabama 35611



Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket No. 50-260, Browns Ferry Nuclear Plant, Unit 2, Limestone County, Alabama




Date of application for amendment: 

May 11, 1994 (TS 347T)


Brief description of amendment: 

The amendment provides a temporary extension of the allowed outage time from 5 to 45 days for 250 volt dc power supplies
which provide control power to the plant shutdown boards. This extension will be in effect from January 1, 1995 to December
31, 1995 to permit the licensee to upgrade the control power supplies with new, higher capacity components.


Date of issuance: 

December 7, 1994


Effective date: 

December 7, 1994


Amendment No.: 

228


Facility Operating License No. 

DPR-52: Amendments revised the Technical Specifications.


Date of initial notice in 

Federal Register: 

August 17, 1994 (59 FR 42347) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation
dated December 7, 1994. 
No significant hazards consideration comments received: None 


Local Public Document Room location: 

Athens Public library, South Street, Athens, Alabama 35611 



Wisconsin Electric Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-266 and 50-301 Point Beach Nuclear Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Town
of Two Creeks 
Manitowoc County, Wisconsin




Date of application for amendments: 

December 10, 1992, as supplemented on March 8, 1994.


Brief description of amendments: 

These amendments revised Technical Specifications (TS) Section 15.3.5, ``Instrumentation System,'' and Section
15.4.1, ``Operational Safety Review.'' Specifically, extensive additions and modifications were made to various
tables which specify requirements for the instrumentation and safety circuits necessary to ensure reactor safety
and provide for the automatic initiation of the engineered safety features.


Date of issuance: 

December 8, 1994


Effective date: 

December 8, 1994


Amendment Nos.: 

157  161


Facility Operating License Nos. 

DPR-24 and DPR-27. Amendments revised the Technical Specifications.


Date of initial notice in 

Federal Register: 

March 25, 1993 (58 FR 16236) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation
dated December 8, 1994. 
The March 8, 1994, submittal, provided additional supplemental information that did not change the initial proposed
no significant hazards consideration determination. 
No significant hazards consideration comments received: No. 


Local Public Document Room location: 

Joseph P. Mann Library, 1516 Sixteenth Street, Two Rivers, Wisconsin 54241



Wisconsin Public Service Corporation, Docket No. 50-305, Kewaunee Nuclear 
Power Plant, Kewaunee County, Wisconsin




Date of application for amendment: 

September 17, 1993, as supplemented on August 31, 1994.


Brief description of amendment: 

The amendment revises the Kewaunee Nuclear Power Plant (KNPP) Technical Specifications (TS) by incorporating technical
and administrative changes to TS 4.5, Emergency Core Cooling System and Containment Air Cooling System Tests; TS
4.7, Main Steam Isolation Valves; and Table TS 4.1-3, Minimum Frequencies for Equipment Tests. Changes have been
made to the safety injection (SI) system automatic initiation test; the internal containment spray system (ICS)
flow blockage test; the SI, ICS and residual heat removal pumps' periodic tests; the main steam isolation valves'
test; and the periodic control rod functional test.


Date of issuance: 

November 30, 1994


Effective date: 

November 30, 1994


Amendment No.: 

114


Facility Operating License No. 

DPR-43. Amendment revised the Technical Specifications.


Date of initial notice in 

Federal Register: 

January 19, 1994 (59 FR 2874) The August 31, 1994, submittal, changed the wording of TS 4.5.a.2.B to specify the number
of spray nozzles required for the system to function properly. This modification was not outside the scope of the original
notice and did not change the initial proposed no significant hazards consideration determination. 
The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated November 30, 1994.

No significant hazards consideration comments received: No.


Local Public Document Room location: 

 University of Wisconsin Library Learning Center, 2420 Nicolet Drive, Green Bay, Wisconsin 54301.



Wolf Creek Nuclear Operating Corporation, Docket No. 50-482, Wolf Creek Generating Station, Coffey County, Kansas




Date of amendment request: 

July 15, 1994


Brief description of amendment: 

This amendment revises Technical Specification Table 4.3-3, Radiation Monitoring Instrumentation for Plant Operations
Surveillance Requirements, to change the analog channel operational test interval for selected radiation monitors
from monthly to quarterly.


Date of issuance: 

November 28, 1994


Effective date: 

November 28, 1994, to be implemented with 30 days of the date of issuance


Amendment No.: 

80


Facility Operating License No. 

NPF-42. The amendment revised the Technical Specifications.


Date of initial notice in 

Federal Register: 

October 26, 1994 (59 FR 53845) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation
dated November 28, 1994. 
No significant hazards consideration comments received: No. 


Local Public Document Room locations: 

Emporia State University, William Allen White Library, 1200 Commercial Street, Emporia, Kansas 66801 and Washburn
University School of Law Library, Topeka, Kansas 66621



Dated at Rockville, Maryland, this 14th day of December 1994.
For the Nuclear Regulatory Commission 


<SIGNER>
Steven A. Varga, 
</SIGNER>
<SIGNJOB>
Director, Division of Reactor Projects - I/II, Office of Nuclear Reactor Regulation


</SIGNJOB>
<FRFILING>
[FR Doc. 9431196 Filed 122094; 8:45 am]

</FRFILING>
<BILLING>
BILLING CODE 759001F
</BILLING>

